Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Number of Reviews
34

Author
Ife Hsu
Twentieth Century Fox Release (1996)
Running Time: Approx. 2:20 hr
Starring: Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Robert
Loggia, Margaret Colin..
Director: Roland Emmerich
The idea of alien invasion brings endless plot possibilities.
Just describing the far advanced alien technology that permits
billions of light-year traveling might have filled up an entire
script.  But the makers of Independency Day (ID4) chosed to
focus on the lives of three characters: An US Marine fighter
pilot with aspirations of space-traveling (Will Smith), the
American President dealing with negative poll results (Bill
Pullman), and a MIT grad/expert in complex-system hacking (Jeff
Goldblum). 
ID4 covers a three day period (July 2nd thru 4th) observing the
alien arrival, its destructive colonization tactics, and the
world-wide military convergence that fights back the outer space
intruders.  Implausible and repeated coincidences bring the
three main characters together along with the people they care for. 
In the first two days, ID4 never looses grip to its grand
entrance. Many faces are introduced and quickly disposed with
minimal care. A single strike was all it took to annihilate New
York, Washington, and Los Angeles. So, as expected, the
counter-measures by the US military force proved meaningless and
ineffective. 
But in the final day, Smith, Pullman, and Goldblum are converged
to devise and execute a survival plan for Earth. At this stage,
ID4 loosely introduces a X-File-type government conspiracy and
covert operation. It narrows its premise to focus on this group
while sketches of the aliens and their technology are quickly
shown to satisfy audience's curiosity. 
The final strike is again built in total disbelief. World-wide
forces are joined together via primitive communication
mechanism; alien spacecraft can be intuitively piloted; alien's
defensive air force is no longer as agile and efficient; all
other areas in the planet have equivalent fire-power that can
prevail against the invaders.
Clearly, ID4 is not to be taken seriously. It is a feel-good
movie (despite millions of casualties) that is heavily grounded
on special-effects. There is simply not enough time to explain
much, and ID4 does not have the intention to do so anyway.  

Author
Larry Mcgillicuddy
**** (out of 4)
Directed by Roland Emmerich
Starring Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Will Smith, Margaret Colin,Robert 
Loggia, Mary McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Randy Quaid, Harry Connick Jr., 
Harvey Fierstein, Adam Baldwin, Andrew Keegan, Devon Gummersall
Review-   Stargate was one of the worst science fiction movies I've ever 
seen. It was dull, moronic, and not exciting for a minute. Roland 
Emmerich directed that movie. Someone named Roland Emmerich directed this 
movie. Before I saw Independence Day, I thought it was the same person. 
Now I'm not so sure. There is nothing dull or moronic about this movie, 
and I was gripped the entire way through. In short, Independence Day 
delivers exactly what it promised.
Independence Day provides us with an old reliable scare story. What if we 
were visited from another planet? What if the visitors were not so 
friendly? How would we react to this situation? All of these questions 
are answered in an exciting, intelligent, and humorous way. 
Aliens have entered our atmosphere. At first we're not so sure what to 
expect. All the world can do is wait. Then a mathemetician played by Jeff 
Goldblum (big stretch, huh?) discovers the aliens are using our 
satellites against us. In doing so, he is able to warn the White House so 
they can get out of Washington DC soon enough, saving the lives of many, 
including the president, played by Bill Pullman. A fighter pilot, played 
by Will Smith, survives a dogfight with an alien spaceship, and drags the 
alien from its damaged spacecraft to a secret base. Many cities have been 
destroyed and not much time is left. The Americans must discover a way to 
fight back. 
A stellar cast of reliable character actors was assembled for this movie. 
Bill Pullman plays the president with great dignity and honor, and a 
speech he gives to the troops on the night of  the counterattack had me 
cheering, along with the rest of the audience. jeff Goldblum, one of my 
favorite actors, is just as quirky, original, and amusing as he always is.
 His offbeat line readings are always a great pleasure, and they work 
very well here. Will Smith is quickly becoming a major movie star, and he 
is the best hotshot fighter pilot since Tom Cruise. He also gets much 
funnier things to say than in Bad Boys, for example. And then there are 
the special effects. Not for one second were any of them unbeleivable. 
The over 2 hour running time, which never feels long, leaves room for 
enough romantic subplots that even Jeff Goldblum gets one.  If you want 
to see some Americans banding with the rest of the world to "get up there 
and woop ET's ass" go see Independence Day. I'll probably be in line with 
you when I see it again. This movie was worth the hype.

Author
Chad Polenz

****
1996, PG-13, 145 minutes [2 hours, 25 minutes]
[science fiction]
starring: Bill Pullman (President Thomas Whitmore), Will Smith (Captain
Steve Hiller), Jeff Goldblum (Dave Levinson), Margaret Coplin (Connie),
Randy Quaid (Russell Case), Robert Loggia (General Gray), Judd Hirsch
(Julius "Pops" Levinson), produced by Dean Devlin, written by Dean Devlin,
Roland Emmerich, directed by Roland Emmerich.
        Wow! I am so blown away by this film that I am nearly speechless.
Rarely does a film come along that is such an excellent blend of excellent
storytelling, suspense, and adventure and is able to synchronize it as
well as this film does. At times this movie becomes something more, it is
something that can unite everyone together and move an audience. This is
an excellent achievement in great storytelling, special effects, and most
of all its ability to take a rather complicated plot and make it so
breezy. The sensation and excitement are unlike anything I've ever
experienced since the "Star Wars" trilogy, and that's something even
remotely difficult to stand up to.
The story starts out with some scientists realizing that something
huge is approaching the Earth and is giving off a radio code that is
reducing itself as it constantly recycles - a definite warning of some
type. It gets closer until they realize that it is actually a group of
huge UFOs approaching the Earth's atmosphere. Even though not much has
happened, the sense of intense excitement and suspense builds very
quickly, we are wondering who these aliens are and why they are here.
When the ships finally enter the atmosphere, panic ensues and
President Thomas Whitmore (Pullman) addresses the country and tries to
calm everyone down. One of the scientists who first discovered the aliens
(Jeff Goldblum as Dave Levinson) has an ex-wife (Margaret Coplin as
Connie) who is an assistant to the president and is able to meet with him
and warn him of the countdown. Suddenly the suspense builds to a boil as
they realize that they are about to be obliterated. We get quite a cliche
escape scene and many terrifying devastation scenes, but the suspense,
combined with the excellent special effects are so unbelievable that it is
all breathtaking.
What follows is a fantastic aerial battle between U.S. Marine F-18
Tomcats and alien ships, perhaps one of the single most exciting scenes I
have ever viewed. Just consider the situation for a minute, our own
military up against aliens from another planet - how cool is that? In most
stories of the genre we are so far behind in technology that we are
immediately incinerated, here we at least fight back, but do not win (at
first). 
Will Smith also stars as one of those pilots - Captain Steve
Hiller, and he was perfectly cast for the role. His character is quite
hyper and yet easy going, he seems so right for the film, unlike a
character that could have been played by Harrison Ford or Tom Cruise. When
Hiller is psyched to "whoop E.T.'s ass" we know exactly how he feels, and
when he is actually able to shoot down one of the aliens he is still so
psyched that he cold cocks the alien and knocks him out! It does not seem
at all corny or trite at the time, the audience is just as psyched and as
scared as Hiller is, it works well and this is how the entire movie feels.
We did not win because we cannot overpower their technology, will
these visitors conquer the planet or just destroy it? When the president
and the military all meet at super secret "Area 51" they realize that the
CIA had captured an alien ship 50 years ago and has learned much about
their anatomy and technology. This is the only real time that film starts
to become a little too formulated, just the basic idea of what is
happening reminds one of an Ed Wood film. We even get a mad scientist of
sorts, but is this a parody or something to be taken seriously?
Like all other stories of the sort, Devlin and Emmerich's script
makes us wonder if there is any chance at all for victory, and of course
some kind of loophole is found, and of course it will take a super
exciting, cliffhanger scene to overcome the conflict but the payoff is
well worth it. At first we witnessed our boys lose to the aliens and it
was exciting just because of the mood, now that the entire world is united
together and actually winning it brings about a sense of courage, pride,
excitement and suspense.
"Independence Day" isn't Shakespeare but it's still very
excellent, it might not be the most realistic story but I think that's the
point. We tend to take our movies too seriously today, if we just leave
our cynicism behind and use our imagination we'll experience something so
fantastic words will not be able to describe it. (7/7/96) (12/9/96) [other
films of this genre: the "Star Wars" trilogy, "The War Of The Worlds,"
"V," other films by Emmerich: "Stargate"]

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Will Smith, Jeff Goldblum, Bill Pullman, Margaret Colin, 
      Robert Loggia, Vivica Fox, Judd Hirsch, Mary McDonnell, 
      Randy Quaid, Brent Spiner, James Rebhorn, Harvey Fierstein, 
      Harry Connick Jr., Adam Baldwin
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producers: Dean Devlin 
Screenplay: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Cinematography: Karl Walter Lindenlaub
Music: David Arnold
U.S. Distributor: Twentieth Century Fox
     Credit the marketing masters at Twentieth Century Fox -- they've 
managed to make INDEPENDENCE DAY the most eagerly-anticipated motion 
picture of a potentially record-breaking summer.  Tantalizing shots of 
the White House and Empire State Building being destroyed by alien ships 
have been shown in multiplexes since last Christmas.  It's a saturation 
philosophy:  show the previews before every movie and tell people that 
this is "the event" of 1996, and they will come.  Whether INDEPENDENCE 
DAY takes in $30 million, $50 million, or $80 million during its first 
weekend is irrelevant -- it will make a huge splash.  Unfortunately, and 
perhaps not unexpectedly, it doesn't live up to the hype.  
     From the beginning, there have been reasons to doubt INDEPENDENCE 
DAY's creative foundation.  After all, it comes from Roland Emmerich and 
Dean Devlin, the team responsible for STARGATE, one of the most 
disappointing and derivative science fiction films of the decade.  
Theirs is not a pedigree to inspire confidence, and, as it turns out, 
INDEPENDENCE DAY is no better than STARGATE.  
     For mindless action, the first hour is right up there with TWISTER.  
The special effects are impressive and the movie is suitably noisy.  
But, this summer especially, we've had all we need of explosions and 
flashes; the fireworks have lost their zing.  Perhaps if INDEPENDENCE 
DAY had come out earlier, before all the tornadoes, flying dragons, 
Chunnel helicopter-and-train chases, Rail Guns, and escapes into 
Alcatraz, I might have welcomed it more warmly.  At this point, however, 
action -- even of the science fiction variety -- has become a stale, 
overused commodity.  Almost everyone loves chocolate, but, if you eat a 
lot of it, you start feeling sick.  I'm sure you understand the 
comparison.  
     Worse still, INDEPENDENCE DAY gets mired in syrupy, artificial 
character development, and this bogs down the entire middle act.  Once 
the aliens have blasted their way through New York, Los Angeles, and 
Washington, this film doesn't offer much in the way of compelling 
viewing.  With its hackneyed plot, feeble attempts at characterization, 
and predictable finale, the second half of INDEPENDENCE DAY becomes an 
extremely dull and lifeless affair.
     In case you haven't figured it out by now, the story centers around 
an alien invasion.  After emerging from the dark side of the moon, a 
dozen fifteen-mile diameter spaceships enter a hovering patterns over 
Earth's major cities.  In Los Angeles, a marine officer, Captain Steven 
Hiller (Will Smith), has been recalled from holiday leave to "kick 
E.T.'s butt."  In Washington, President Thomas J. Whitmore (Bill 
Pullman) is concerned about creating a widespread panic by ordering 
evacuations.  And, in New York City, David Levinson (Jeff Goldblum) has 
just broken one of the aliens' secret codes, and it leads him to believe 
that an attack is imminent.  As it turns out, he's right, and the human 
race is soon embroiled in a desperate struggle to survive.  The aliens' 
ships are shielded, and nothing, not even nuclear weapons, can penetrate 
their defenses.   
     The excessive number of characters is in part responsible for the 
movie's unnecessarily long running time.  Had INDEPENDENCE DAY been a 
half hour shorter, it would have been more tightly paced and less 
tedious.  Among the superfluous characters are the First Lady (Mary 
McDonnell), a mentally unstable crop duster (Randy Quaid), and a sneaky 
Secretary of Defense (James Rebhorn).  Since these people have no 
dramatic impact, all they manage to do is eat up screen time.  
     Like STARGATE, INDEPENDENCE DAY cannibalizes heavily from past 
science fiction ventures, including THE DAY THE EARTH STOOD STILL, STAR 
WARS, STAR TREK, ALIEN, CLOSE ENCOUNTERS, V, THE X-FILES, and about 
another half-dozen TV programs and movies.  It's legitimate to question 
whether Emmerich and Devlin are capable of doing anything remotely 
original.  There's a distressing sameness and familiarity to both of 
their big budget science fiction extravaganzas.  
     It's useless to advise people not to see INDEPENDENCE DAY, so I'll 
issue a warning instead:  curb your enthusiasm and don't expect much.  
With suitably low expectations, you're likely not to be too 
disappointed, unless you make the mistake of actually thinking about 
what's taking place on-screen while it's going on.  The last half hour 
is built on a series of contrivances and implausibilities that even a 
six-year old could find serious flaw with, so be prepared to use the 
"brain off" switch.  But INDEPENDENCE DAY isn't about logic and 
intelligence.  It's about space battles, mass destruction, and a 
laughably "rousing" speech by the President.  This is a spectacle, pure 
and simple.  Unfortunately, because the film makers mistakenly tried to 
inject a load of weak dramatic elements, INDEPENDENCE DAY turns out to 
be overlong, overblown, and overdone.  For alien invasions this summer, 
give me THE ARRIVAL instead.  
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Joe Blenkle
     If you can suspend all common sense for the two hours and 17
minutes that INDEPENDENCE DAY runs, you'll be in great shape, but if
you're one of those moviegoers who looks for things wrong with films,
plots and everything else, you'll probably have a field day with this
movie.
     I am one of those who goes to a film to be entertained (i.e. -
film reviewer), not a person who looks for things wrong or wonders
what signifigance a lamp has sitting on a table (i.e. - film critic),
and INDEPENDENCE DAY is a terrific film if you can suspend all belief
in reality.
     As the film is brand new to theaters across the country, I don't
want to give too much away, but some of the things that happen in this
film are too unbelievable if you think about them for too long. But
the wonderful thing about INDEPENDENCE DAY is that the movie doesn't
give you a chance to think about anything for too long as it is an
edge-of-your-seat thriller all the way through.
      You may find yourself pondering later on, however, how an Air
Force pilot learns to pilot an alien ship in a matter of hours or how
a woman survives a firestorm rushing through a tunnel by hiding in a
small room as the fire rushes by outside. At the very least she should
have suffocated as the fire consumed all the oxygen, or been
incinerated by the intense heat only a few feet away. There are many
of these insults to common sense throughout the film, but they are
easily overlooked due to the intense action throughout the film.
     By now everyone has heard what INDEPENDENCE DAY is all about.
There has been a lot of pre-release hype and for once the film
actually lives up to its fantastic billing.
     The cast list is impressive with a lineup including Will Smith,
Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Randy Quaid,
Robert Loggia and Brent Spiner.
    I have never really been a fan of Goldblum's, but this film did a
lot to change that. The whole cast does an excellent job holding your
attention throughout the movie, especially Smith and later in the
film, Goldblum.
   Spiner's character was somewhat wasted, however, playing a crazed
scientist-type in charge of the government's alien research project.
Fortunately the audience didn't have to endure his part for very long.
   The special effects in INDEPENDENCE DAY are fantastic, especially
the fireball sequences where buildings are blown apart and early in
the film when the alien ships come rolling in engulfed in clouds of
fire.
   There are enough narrow escapes in this film to last you well into
next year and an equal number of little twists and turns in the plot
that will keep you guessing until the very end. INDEPENDENCE DAY even
has its little bits of comedy which will keep you off balance and
never knowing what to expect next.
     I've heard this film described as a cross between STAR WARS, TOP
GUN and WAR OF THE WORLDS - and it's every bit that and more.
     The lines are probably going to be long throughout the summer for
this film, but INDEPENDENCE DAY is one movie that is well worth the
wait.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY is a 20th Century Fox presentation starring
Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd Hirsch,
Randy Quaid, Robert Loggia and Brent Spiner. Directed by Roland
Emmerich. Produced by Dean Devlin. Executive Producer is Roland
Emmerich, Ute Emmerich and William Fay. Screenplay by Dean Devlin and
Roland Emmerich. Release date: July 2, 1996. Running time: 137
minutes.
This review, photos, upcoming attractions, links and more can be found
on my movie review web page at:
http://www.calweb.com/~jblenkle/movies - stop by and visit!
Guest reviews welcomed - email me at jblenkle@calweb.com

Author
Michael Redman
First of all, there are several different things going on here, all 
separate but connected parts of the whole. There is "ID4: The Movie", 
"ID4: The Ride", and lest we forget, "ID4: The Hype And Cash Machine".
Unless you've been in a coma for the past few months or don't have cable 
and watch only PBS, you've been exposed to the unprecedented advertising 
campaign. When you heard the words "Independence Day", it was a safe bet 
they weren't talking about the holiday. Rarely has any film aroused such 
pre-release excitement.
So exciting that it generated over $94 million during its first 5 1/2 
days of release. So exciting that dozens of theaters around the country 
were showing 24 hour screenings for the first few days: shows at 1:30am, 
4:00am, 6:30am. So exciting that tickets were sold out hours before the 
shows to people camping in line with big coolers and sleeping bags. No 
matter how good the movie turned out to be, the hype was a work of art 
itself.
Somehow Fox even arranged for a massive power black-out up and down the 
west coast on opening night.
"ID4: The Ride"? It's phenomenal! Some films are more like amusement 
park thrillers than cinema and this is one of the best of that genre. 
Just take your seat, strap in and hold on. Monitor your cola consumption 
because the roller coaster doesn't provide many breaks. One of the marks 
of audience involvement is their relationship with their bladders: how 
casually they take their trips to the restroom. Here, people are 
__sprinting__ to and from the john so as not to miss anything.
There's enough stuff blown up and smashed and burned to a crisp to 
satisfy any summer action junkie. Jet fighters zooming here and there, 
alien death rays trashing all the world's major cities, massive 
devastation on a global scale! It's perfect! The best science fiction 
ride since the "Star Wars" films.
And then there's that pesky "ID4: The Movie" thing. There are a few 
problems. There's nothing new here. The producers have ripped off dozens 
of films ("Close Encounters", "Star Wars", "War Of The Worlds", "The 
Right Stuff", "Dr. Strangelove", "Jurassic Park", "The Day The Earth 
Stood Still" and on and on and on), word for word, scene for scene. 
During one dogfight scene with Will Smith being chased through canyons 
by an alien ship, I was sure I was about to hear "Use the Force, Will. 
Use the Force!"
I believe that kinder reviewers call these scenes "homages", but it's an 
odd film that can succeed with nothing but homages.
Fortunately "ID4" is that odd film. All of the pieces are well crafted 
into a quilt that, while it isn't original, sure does its job.
The casting is top-notch in most cases. The Fresh Prince is surprisingly 
refreshing as the wise-cracking jet pilot who becomes earth's last hope. 
Jeff Goldblum as the computer wiz who figures it all out works well with 
Judd Hirsch, his kibitzing dad. Randy Quaid, Harvey Fierstein and Harry 
Connick, Jr., among dozens of others, are grand. Bill Pullman as the 
Clintonesque president is something of a dead fish (or is that lame 
duck?), but then, we expect most of our politicians to behave that way.
See it. You'll have to forget about any attempt to look at the film 
intellectually, but let it possess your body and take over. You'll love 
it!
[This originally appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, 
Indiana, 7/11/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Author
Michael Dequina
Everyone knows the story--"July 2... they arrive.  July 3... they
attack.  July 4 is... Independence Day--the day we fight back."  The
question remains, does the hype monster ID4 live up to its massive buildup?
In a word, no.  Despite some awesome effects, the just OK Independence Day
is done in by too many uninteresting subplots and not nearly enough action.
The major players in this '90s-era disaster tale of alien invasion
(told in three labeled sections: "July 2," "July 3," and "July 4") are: Air
Force fighter pilot Steven Hiller (Will Smith, cool as ever); his stripper
girlfriend Jasmine (Vivica Fox); scientist David Levinson (Jeff Goldblum,
doing another variation of his roles in Jurassic Park and Powder); his
father (Judd Hirsch in an embarrassing Jewish stereotype); alcoholic
cropduster pilot Russell Case (an excrutiatingly hammy Randy Quaid); United
States President Thomas Whitmore (Bill Pullman, back in boring mode); his
wife (Mary McDonnell); and the White House communications director (Margaret
Colin).  As in the tradition of '70s disaster flicks, these and other
characters lead their own dissimilar lives until a larger-than-life disaster
(in this case, a hostile worldwide alien invasion) unites them.
And there lies ID4's ruinous problem--director/co-writer Roland
Emmerich and producer/co-writer Dean Devlin (the people who perpetrated
StarGate) spend too much time (and, in the process, bloat the running time
to nearly two and a half hours) establishing these frankly, with the
exception of Smith's engaging wisecracker, boring characters and even more
boring problems.  I like a good soap as much as the next person, but ID4's
"human element" is not a good soap--uninvolving and devoid of any interest,
not to mention credibility straining and, at times, unnecessary: was it
really necessary to have Goldblum and Colin's characters be ex-spouses?  If
Devlin and Emmerich were smart, they would have just let Goldblum be just a
scientist and Colin just a presidential adviser, in the process shaving off
15 minutes of interminable screen time devoted to their relationship
problems.  The same can be said of Quaid's drunk pilot and completely
colorless trailer park family, all of whom appear to have wandered in from
another film.  Their "bittersweet" storyline, along with the "tearjerking"
one of the President and the First Lady, are supposed to add some human
"emotion" to the proceedings, but the melodramatic moments feel forced and
are not the slightest bit involving.
Devlin said recently at a Los Angeles comic book/science fiction
convention that special effects don't matter if you don't care about the
characters.  However, the spectacular visual effects and production design
mattered much more to me than the cardboard space fillers passed off as
characters.  ID4 only comes to life during the elaborate effects sequences,
which _do_ deliver.  The explosive annhilation of New York and Los Angeles
truly must be seen on the big screen to be believed (I shudder to think how
all the spectacular effects would look on the small screen,
panned-and-scanned, no less), as do the gigantic, cavernous interior of the
mothership, and the two aerial battle sequences, which brings me to another
problem with the picture: lack of action.  Those two battle scenes, one in
the middle and one at the end, are pretty much all ID4 have to offer in
terms of action.  That would be acceptable if (1) the film weren't so
aggressively hyped as a big action extravaganza and (2) there were something
interesting going during the down time; alas, all we get are a few good
lines from Smith, by far the breakout star of the film, and the excrutiating
"human dimension."  For the slam bang action connoisseur, ID4 is a bust.
The script also gives the aliens the short end of the stick.  With
the exception of one violent lab scene reminiscent of Alien, the audience
and the earthlings never experience any up-close terror with the aliens;
virtually all of their damage is done via their massive spacecrafts, and, as
a result, they aren't nearly as terrifying and menacing as they should be.
What is missing is more direct contact with the invaders.  In the end, it is
more a question of whether or not the humans can defeat the alien technology
than defeat the aliens themselves.
My lukewarm reaction to the film appears to be in the minority, for
ID4 has already grossed a truly astounding $95 million in its first 5 1/2
days, and general audience opinion has been ecstatic.  But, as with all
insanely popular films, some sort of backlash is bound to happen sooner or
later.  Here's hoping it's sooner, for the mega-hyped ID4, while not
especially bad, is far from anything great.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Roland Emmerich
Writers: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Starring: Will Smith, Jeff Goldblum, Bill Pullman, Judd Hirsch, Margaret 
Colin, Randy Quaid, Mary MacDonnell, Vivica A. Fox, Robert Loggia, 
Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr., Brent Spiner, Adam Baldwin
According to popular film opinion, a film's greatness is determined by 
time.  Take for example "Casablanca."  Great film, even today.  It's 
still as powerful as it was when it came out and still as romantic and 
tragic.  Another example would be "Star Wars," which had a very, very 
healthy box office gross despite the fact that we had all seen it about 
3 billion times before.  But as I rewatched "Independence Day" when it 
came out on video after being the number one hit of 1996, I kinda felt 
like it wasn't as cool as when I had first seen it.  I had liked it when 
I saw it the first time (*** was my original view) and basically saw it 
as a good "escape film."  But when I rewatched it, I felt cheated.  
Thus, the curse of the "event film."
"Independence Day" is like that kid who come out of nowhere and makes 
everybody happy at once (except for a couple kids - the critics, in this 
situation).  But after a while, this kid becomes annoying and you just 
wait for the next one.  Well, this kid is the "event film" in my little 
analogy.  And when I rewatched "Independence Day," not only did it not 
look cooler at all on the big screen, but I felt insulted the whole 
time.  There are too many gaping craters in the plot and you just aren't 
sure if it's comedy or hokey drama.  One scene, you'll see a hilariously 
nebbish scene between Jeff Goldblum and Judd Hirsch; the next you'll see 
a bunch of military uptight guys walking around, saying corny lines.  
The worst is a scene between Brent Spiner and Bill Pullman where Spiner 
is sayinig something innocently funny but is barked like a junkyard dog 
by Bill Pullman who gives him the most unitentionally funniest speech 
since the end of "Glen or Glenda?"
Now this annoying kid's problem is that in the process of trying to make 
everyone like him all at once, he shows he has no balls.  And 
"Independence Day" has no balls.  It plays it safe everywhere.  It 
throws in a ton of action that is borrowed from other superior films.  
The chase scene between the alien ship and Will Smith is straight out of 
"Star Wars."  I mean, isn't that Devil's Den?  And the aliens are about 
as anticlimactic as Demi Moore's breasts in "Striptease."  They're these 
octopus men, boring freaking octopus men.  I mean, come on.  The aliens 
in "2001" were more interesting and you didn't even see them!
Basically the plot is straight from a B-Movie from the 50s: aliens come 
to earth and we wonder if they're hostile or peaceful.  Okay, it's an 
interesting topic, but it's not handled greatly.  Now they aren't and 
somehow a computer geek, Jeff Goldblum, figure out they're using our 
satellites as a countdown to destruction.  Yep.  These aliens are not 
only heavily armed, they're stupid too.  They also use the same kind of 
computer as we do, but that comes about later.  The president (Bill 
Pullman), who's under attack for being a wimp, decides this would be a 
nice time to be belligerent, and he decides he'll stay in the White 
House which the aliens have covered.  I don't care if it's Bob freaking 
Dole in the White House, get him out of there.  I don't care if you have 
to inject him with sodium pentathol, just get him out of there.  Later 
on, he's stupid and wants to fly in the attack on a big alien ship.  I 
think it's time for impeachment for this guy.  He's more senile than 
Reagan on pot.
Then there's a cocky pilot (Will Smith) who is the only person to 
survive the counter-attack on the second day and becomes Moses in 
leading his children to the elusive Area 51 (the film's only sign of 
being brave).  His girlfriend's a stripper sharing a subplot with 
"Striptease" in that she has to do it for her son.  Come on, she has a 
fighter pilot boyfriend/soon-to-be fiance.  I think she can quit that 
job and get a more respectable job at Long John Silvers.  She's also the 
few, the proud, the lucky to survive the igniting of L.A. (as well as 
her dog, who narrowly survives).  
There are some bright spots.  They tossed in enough old film homages to 
keep me laughing.  The best one is when Jeff Goldblum (nicely named 
David) turns on his computer and a picture of HAL comes up and says, 
"Good Morning, Dave."  And they even played R.E.M.'s "It's the End of 
the World As We Know It (And I Feel Fine) at the beginning.  And Judd 
Hirsch steals the film by actually acting great (he's a stereotype, but 
I just loved the man anyway).  But there are no real subtle comic 
moments.  Will gets way too many one-liners and he has no one to play 
off of (execept Jeff towards the end, and the two do great).  
As I said, this film has no balls.  It is just aiming for a crowd 
pleaser and that's what it is.  But after a couple months, we all move 
on to the next "event" film while intaking little films and a couple 
indy ones for good measure.  But at least the indy ones last for a 
lifetime.  This one's short on batteries.

Author
Steve Schear
In short: An entertaining, if juvevile, summer Sci-Fi flic. INDEPENDENCE
DAY (ID4) is full of great special effects, poor science, a few memorable
one-liners and a thin plot lifted from WAR OF THE WORLDS and a two-part
STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION episode.  ID4 will no doubt make gobs of
money, but I predict will be no more memorable than the team's previous,
also flawed, effort "STARGATE".
Cast in the footsteps of Irwin Allen's destruction epics, ID4 has a large
cast of stereotypical characters with little for an over 25 audience to
identify with.  The plot is simple:  Evil aliens come to conquor Earth in a
mother ship 1/4th the size of the moon and dispatch a dozen or so "smaller"
ships, only a 15-miles across, to lay waste to Earth's cities.
Not since George Pal's 1953 film THE WAR OF THE WORLDS has someone had the
guts to offer up a decent global destruction, alien invasion, film.  The
special effects for showing the massive carnage were considered too
expensive.  Producer and director Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin (who
co-wrote the screenplay) were convinced the technology was ready and cost
effective, and the results are spectacular.
However, from the start the screenwriters basic leave science behind (they
obviously never took Astronomy 101).  If an object the size (and assumed
mass) of the Mother Ship came into Earth's proximity our world would be
quickly torn apart by tidal forces.  This is how the astroids were formed.
No need to invade. The aliens could just harvest the debris.
As humanity's extermination begins, the characters lives are drawn
together.  Although it seems we don't have a chance, somehow we have to
find a way to beat their superior technology.  The Alien ships are huge and
protected by an impenetratable shield.  This is going to be really tough,
in fact, its really impossible given the available time and Earth's
technolgy.  And therein lie the problem!  ID4 would have been much better
and more believable had the Aliens won the first round, destroying the
Earth.
Bill Pullman plays the American President as a completly unbelievable
character, an honest politition.  A naive young ex-fighter pilot of the
gulf war, with strong honor and ethics, he'd must have run as a self-funded
independent to get elected.  He's weak and nice, not at all the type to be
a leader.
Given the script, the performances are very good.  Will Smith plays a
charming and cocky fighter pilot; Jeff Goldblum is a nebish computer nerd,
with Judd Hirsch as his streotypical Jewish father; and Brent Spinner is
great as a recluse xenobiologist in charge of the top-secret Area 51 base.
I felt that Brent's role should have been expanded.  A good cameo is given
by Harry Connick, Jr. as Will's squadron mate, and beautiful Vivica Fox
offers up a good love interest for Will.
The special effects are the focus of the movie.  Most impressive are the
destruction of New York, Los Angeles and Washington, D.C.
Trekkies should recognize ID4's plot as little more than a thin re-hash of
TNG's Borg episode.  The Mother ship with its reliance on central
coordination is almost straight from the series, as is Goldblum's use of a
computer virus to disable the Alien defenses.
The President is taken to Area 51 where Brent shows him the bodies of three
Aliens and their fighter craft which crashed almost 50 years ago in the New
Mexico desert.  Government scientists had been studying them all this time,
but couldn't figure out how they work, or even get the ship to power up.
That is until the Mother ship and its coordinating signal is received.  The
speed, only a few hours, with which Jeff's character is able to comprehend
the intracicies of an Alien technology and devise a computer virus was for
me the script's last straw.
Jeff and Will volunteer to deliver a pair of nukes to the mother ship using
the resurected Alien fighter.  That they could fool the Mother ship's
advanced communication and coordination technology into accepting into its
bossom a craft missing for 50 years, made my jaw drop.
The renowned English playright Oscar Wilde must have had works like ID4 in
mind when quiped that, "Nobody ever lost money underestimating the
intelligence of the audience."

Author
Jason Wallis
"Independence Day" * * 1/2 (out of four)
Starring Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd
Hirsch, Brent Spiner and Randy Quaid
Directed by Roland Emmerich
     Anyone who knows me is aware of my hatred for comtemporary Hollywood.
I loathe almost every big budget Hollywood production I come across.  Oh,
sure, there's the rare exception (i.e. "Face/Off" and "Men in Black"), but
they're mostly just cash-cow crap.  And the only reason these exceptions
are actually good is because of character development or just sheer
cleverness.  Well, Roland Emmerich's "Independence Day" posseses neither of
these qualities.  But I was shocked to discover that, although in a very
guilty-pleasurish way, I actually kinnda dug it.
     Usually, I am not entertained by mere explosions and loud noises, but
the makers of "Independence Day" (or "ID4") accompany all the stupid
explosions and whatnot with some very good one-liners, delivered very
effectivly by the entire cast. I particularly liked (as I'm sure everyone
did) the character played by Will Smith.  I was never a big fan of his TV
show "The Fresh Prince of Bel Air" and have never seen nor have any desire
to see "Bad Boys" (mostly because of Martin Lawrence - can't stand the
guy), but here, he shows that he was some real talent that other action
stars like Sylvester Stalone or Ah-nold Schwarzenegger very rarely get to
display.  And when he made the fantastic "Men in Black" the following year,
he proved to the world (or me, at least) that he truly deserves his star
status.  Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid are also great in their roles, by the
way.
     But, having said that, there are not enough strong points in
"Independence Day" for me to really recommend it.  Many great actors are
wasted in this film, especially Brent Spiner.  Now I've never been a huge
Trekie, but anyone who's seen even a single episode of "Star Trek: The Next
Generation" can see that Spiner is an excellent actor (he even had a cool
cameo in "Phenomenon").  But no, instead of taking a well-written role to
make make a cameo appearence, he has to choose to play the sterotypical
nutcase scientist.  In "Star Trek", even though he played an android, you
could see underlying emotions that not very many other actors could
pull-off.  Here, he just seems like a grown-up asshole trying to be funny. 
     And then there's Bill Pullman, who I'm a huge fan of.  He shines in
almost every film he's in and I think he even deserves an Oscar nomination
for his recent role in "Lost Highway".  Well, here, he sucks.  And it's not
that his acting sucks, it's that his character is very poorly written and
extrememly one-dimentional.  However, you can't really blame poor Bill
because, despite how good of an actor you are, if you're given a bad
character, you can't be expected to perform.  Just look at Jack Nicholson
in "Mars Attacks!".  Even though he's the greatest actor to ever live, he
couldn't get anything out of his character (or characters, in his case).
     And as for Roland Emmerich, he just needs to find a good story to
film.  With his earlier "Stargate", even though the actual final product
was horrible, he showed amazing skill as a director.  
     Oh, and I almost forgot to mention all the people who were calling
this piece of psuedocrap "Star Wars" for the 90s.  Do yourself a favor and
watch it again, only this
time on video.  Just 'cause a movie is loud and shakes your seat in the
theater, that doesn't mean it can be compared to a classic like "Star Wars"
or any of it's sequels.  That just isn't right.
     So, I actually almost-sorta-kinnda recommend "Independence Day" just
for the performances from Will Smith, Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid and maybe
even for some of the one-liners.  But I still don't see how the American
public can make this one of the top grossing films of all time.  Maybe it's
not up to me to understand...

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 5 July 1996 with Andrea and Kerry at the Ziegfield for $8.50. Also
seen repeatedly on HBO in June 1997. 
After months of watching previews for *Independence Day* it was clear that
I would be seeing it whether I wanted to or not. Gigantic space ships
looming over great cities, worried citizens looking skyward, and every
landmark familiar to us blown to smithereens. While watching one preview
months earlier, the White House is blown up and at least one exuberant
audience member exclaimed "Sign me up!" 
Like movies before and after it, the special effects and the previews were
the true stars of the show. Did you go to Towering Inferno to see Fred
Astaire pet a cat? Did you sit through Earthquake to see Ava Gardner throw
barbs at Charlton Heston? I didn't think so.
Consequently, you didn't go to *Independence Day* to see Jeff Goldblum
chomp on a cigar; you went to see the Capitol blown to bits. I was hoping
for the IRS building, but no dice.
It is clear now why the stars of the movie were not prominently featured
in the previews. The entire story is subordinate to the special effects.
The biggest let down in Independence Day is the opportunity to make the
movie something more than a jingoistic flag waving epic in which only an
American can think up a way to beat the aliens (that it takes a minorities
to do it is something at least). It is also disappointing that after all
the build-up to see the aliens, they are two dimensional as well. Their
entire dialogue and mission is limited to about three or four words,
indicated they are simply evil and bellicose.
Like I said, the buildup is terrific and the let down tremendous. The best
scenes after the aliens start microwaving the world's great cities occur
in the "notorious" Area 51 in the subterranean lab the government has kept
secret all these decades. But it all ends in macho swagger. Oy gevalt. 
The cast is good but not stellar. The comic talents of Judd Hirsch,
Margaret Colin, and Harvey Fierstein do go a long way to temper the
general testosterone nonsense perpetuated by Will Smith, Bill Pullman,
Jeff Goldblum, Robert Loggia and a host of others; and if Randy Quaid was
included to make sure we were annoyed, mission accomplished. 
In anachronistic retrospect, Contact and Men in Black are preferable.
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey are available at 
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
INDEPENDENCE DAY ** 1/2  Directed by Roland Emmerich. Written by Dean 
Devlin & Emmerich. Photograhy, Karl Walter Lindenlaub. Editing, David 
Brenner. Production design,  Oliver Scholl, Patrick Tatopoulos. Music, 
David Arnold. Cast: Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary 
McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid, Robert Loggia, 
James Rebhorn, Vivica A. Fox, et al. A TCF release. 145 minutes. Rated 
PG-13. 
With the absence of the Soviet Evil Empire, Hollywood is searching for 
arch-enemies. An old one has resurfaced in "Independence Day" : the 
Nasties from Outer Space.
The action take place on a very near future's July 2,3 and 4, when 
Earth is attacked by alien machines. The enemy follows the principle 
of those nested Russian dolls, only limited to three. A mothership 
one-fourth the size of the moon contains mega-saucers (about 15 miles 
wide) that contain critters. The mothership (it looks sometimes like a 
megamongous manhole cover), travels to Earth, releases its ominous 
saucers that position themselves over major Earth cities, casting 
giant shadows. They shoot rays that destroy totally New York, Los 
Angeles and Washington. You wonder why they use the ray-by-ray method 
instead of a single H-Bomb equivalent. But then this is a kid-flick of 
the "You who enter here abandon all logic" persuasion.
It is also, among a host of deja vu things, a return to the 50s and 
60s Cold War fears that sometimes appeared in the guise of space 
invaders; a monster/horror movie; 70s and 80s space movies; and a 
countdown flick.  
There are lots of American heroes around. Highest ranking is President 
Bill Pullman, a former fighter-plane hero of the Gulf war, but with 
most of the prowess done by fighter top gun Captain Will Smith. (He 
has a charming girlfriend, stripper Vivica Fox. She has a kid and a 
great dog).  The brains are supplied by Jeff Goldblum, a 
computer/communications nerd/genius, whose ex-wife Margaret Colin just 
happens to be the President's Chief of Staff. (Needless to say the 
couple are still in love). 
Many people and vehicles populate IP, which is a no-brains, special 
effects film, and a fun movie. But  at some point after the 
destruction of the cities (impressive), the film gets increasingly 
comic-bookish and begins to bore --in my case around minute 80. After 
this one gets  a surfeit of effects at the expense of plot and 
characters. Some of the effects in the final battle are downright 
cheap and cheesy composites, like video games.
Matters slide down after the Freak Show of an alien critter saved in a 
secret laboratory years ago, with its craft, after it crash-landed in 
New Mexico. The alien is straight out of "Alien" movies -- a  
disgusting, slimy, gooey, oozy affair with tentacles. My interest kept 
waning,  except for worrying about Ms. Fox's lovely big dog. It 
survived unharmed. 
ID is as synthetic as they get. The final solution against the aliens 
is a twist of the 1953 "War of the Worlds" where Martians were 
destroyed by germs. Here the germs are updated to computer germs or 
viruses.  While I'm at it, let me tell you that I'm writing this on a 
computer on which I have lavished days of work to get out of a glitch, 
while Goldblum's laptop does wonders in seconds even after the 
destruction of the cities.  
The characters are by and large  cardboard creations in whom cliches 
extend to everything: actions, reactions, facial expressions, gestures 
--and dialogue with lines like:"All we can do now is pray" or "What 
your father did was very brave. You should be proud of him." 
The father in question is another cliche. Vietnam veteran Randy Quaid, 
who claimed to have been abducted, abused and release by aliens is a 
subject of mockery and an alcoholic crop-duster pilot. But can't we 
guess right away that at the end he'll be sober, and a hero? Can't we 
also guess that the President will join the other brave pilots to 
attack the outer-spacers? OK, but I draw the line at the crash session 
where civilians (older former pilots) get instructed in flying the 
latest US planes --and Captain Smith figures out how to operate the 
old alien craft!
ID tries to a be Politically Correct, but I am not sure that stressing 
the Jewishness of Goldblum's father (Judd Hirsch) in caricatural 
fashion, or, similarly, the gayness of a Government scientist 
(gravel-voiced Harvey Fierstein), were thought through by the film's 
German writer-director. There are no Asian-Americans, by the way.

Author
Chew Joo Siang
50's `ALIENS VS. EARTH' IDEA REVAMPED!
If you have been following the movie news over the net, you could not 
have escaped the hype over ID4. It promises to be THE summer film of the 
year and it has all the elements necessary. ID4 opened in the US on 2nd 
of July, and up till now, only after a week of release, it has nearly 
touched the US$100 million mark, a phenomenon last observed when JURASSIC 
PARK was released back in 1993. The premise of the movie is disgustingly 
simple: Earth defends itself against the Aliens, a typical and highly popular 
50's Hollywood theme which manifested itself in many films produced in that era.
The movie opens via STAR WARS, however unoriginal it may be, it worked. 
The aliens have sent a large mother ship (supposedly to be 1/4 size of 
the moon) to attack Earth by deploying attack ships 15 miles in radius to 
all the major cities on Earth. The US President (Pullman) does not know 
of the aliens' intention but soon finds out when David (Goldblum) a 
scientist, discovers that the Aliens are counting down to a synchronised 
attack on all the major cities. Capt. Hiller (Smith), a hot-shot F-18 
pilot are one of the hundreds assigned to take out the hovering alien 
attack ship over Washington DC. His squadron came under heavy alien fire 
after discovering that their weapons were useless against the invaders, he 
crash lands after a spectacular 1-on-1 chase over the Grand Canyon, one of the 
many highlights of the movie. ID4 features many characters and we are 
shown the impact on them as the story progresses. Acting on the whole was 
OK although I thought that Bill Pullman was a bit unsuitable for the 
president role but he did make a very rousing speech before sending his 
troops into battle (do we smell a bit of BRAVEHEART here??).
No prizes for guessing how ID4 ends, its just plain obvious. ID4 borrows 
heavily from STAR WARS, RETURN OF THE JEDI, ALIEN and in some parts of 
the movie, I could even sense a bit of X-FILES on screen. If I were to 
critically review this movie, ID4 is full of plot holes, corny dialogue, 
and ridiculously dumb aliens. However below that wafer-thin plot and 
on-screen flaws, ID4 scored well in playing with the appealing idea of 
the entire world giving up their petty differences to unite themselves as 
one force against the alien invasion. An idea which will have the 
audience strongly rooting for the united front throughout the movie, thus 
maintaining a screen-viewer interaction that virtually render any holes 
in the movie acceptable, no matter how ridiculous.
ID4 was produced under a modest budget of US$68 million, a film of such 
magnitude would have easily been another WATERWORLD but director ROLAND 
EMMERICH (UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, STARGATE) and producer DEAN DEVLIN assembled 
a team which did their own special effects rather than commissioning it 
to ILM or any other special effects company. Some of the effects are not 
too good but most of it are very believable, especially the epic 
standoff between 150 F-18's and 250 alien saucers, reminiscence of the 
classic space battle featured in RETURN OF THE JEDI.
ID4 is a movie for all. Though there are many explosions and implied 
deaths, there are no gory scenes of human destruction, thus young kids 
should be able to take it. Sit back and don't be too critical, chances 
are you will be absorbed into the movie just as I was. If you are not 
planning to watch any movies this year, please, at least make time for 
this one. This film is best watched on the big-screen.

Author
Jamey Hughton
Fun - n. sport, amusement, jest, diversion.
While watching Independence Day, someone who's just began high school
physics may stop and say: `hey.....'. This is not an `intellectual'
disaster movie. In fact, if I had a spare $100 million dollars lying
around, I could have written and produced a similar product. But then
again, the reason one watches a movie like this is certainly not to
scout for realistic characters and sharply written dialogue. The
existence of  ID4 rides largely on the purpose of all-out explosive
entertainment, and in that field, it delivers in large quantities.
Aliens have come to Earth in large, disc-shaped spaceships that have
distributed themselves over all the major cities in the world. The
President (Bill Pullman) advises everyone to remain calm and stay within
their homes, praying that the extraterrestrial lifeforms will not become
hostile. Of course their intent is hostile. This would not be dubbed a
`disaster movie' if the aliens came down to promote peace and love. So,
much to the audience's delight, the visitors put forward a synchronized
attack that levels entire cities within a matter of minutes. It's up to
the President and a band of important survivors to find their attackers'
weaknesses and wipe them out before all is lost.
Included in this group is an array of stereotypes that you would expect.
There is Captain Steven Hiller (Will Smith), an army pilot and family
man. Then there's David Levinson (Jeff Goldblum), a nerdy but undeniably
bright scientist. Margaret Colin plays a White House staff advisor, Judd
Hirsch is David's Jewish pappy, and Mary McDonnell is the First Lady.
These characters' relationship bonds are merely consequential, as is the
situations in which they come together.
The special effects in ID4 are suitably impressive, however not
consistently spectacular. The destruction sequences will have you
strapped to your seat. If there is one thing that director Roland
Emmerich does truly well, it's the set-up. Everything is kept in motion,
ensuring rising suspense as we await the inevitable. Emmerich uses an
effective technique as the visitor's arrive, in which the ship's
towering shadows overtake the Lincoln Memorial, White House and other
various landmarks. In this first half-hour, we are too caught up in
anticipation to worry about the numerous technical flaws that surface.
And then, sure enough, Emmerich gives in to spectacular explosions and
air-borne attacks that will have most audience members gaping in awe.
That's not to say I didn't enjoy the second half. There is so much fun
to be had in this movie, especially for those who don't mind the idiotic
plot. It turns out that Emmerich has a few nifty surprises up his sleeve
(one including a visit to Area 51), and he injects enough gung-ho
adventure into the formula to keep us steadily entertained. The
appearance of the alien lifeforms is, while somewhat creepy, somewhat of
a disappointment.
The script often lets us down. Recycled garble involving protective
shields, uploaded viruses and even a `mother ship' appear early and
often. As long as you don't apply too much knowledge while viewing,
you're going to have a blast. The film recalls sci-fi classics from the
50's and 60's in a competent, enjoyable fashion. The cast is also solid,
even with such familiar roles. Smith and Goldblum fair okay, adding a
personal charm to their boring and obvious caricatures. Pullman is
perfect as the President, and Robert Loggia adds swift assurance to
every scene he is in. Meanwhile, Hirsch is just right, and Randy Quaid
is surprisingly strong while attempting to juggle one of the film's
biggest defects. His fate, as you'll discover early on, is entirely
predictable (but still worthwhile after all).
Don't accuse Independence Day of being moronic. Of course it is. Not
only that, it's obvious, manipulative and downright corny. But if you're
in the mood for some old-fashioned entertainment with new wave special
effects, you couldn't do much better than this exciting and fun-filled
homage.
Contact Jamey at:  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Chuck Dowling
Independence Day (1996) ***** - C:Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum,
Robert Loggia, Randy Quaid, Mary McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Brent Spiner,
Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr.
This is the greatest summer movie ever. I repeat, this is the greatest
summer movie of all-time. This is exactly what a summer movie should be.
It's fun, loud, tense, exciting, action-packed, and it will keep your
attention for two and a half hours.
Unless you've been living in a cave for the last year, you've seen the
previews and know what the film is about. If for some reason you don't,
here's the plot: aliens start to destroy the earth and we have to stop them.
That's it. That's all there is. But it's more than enough. With that you get
mass destruction, hundreds of human and alien aircraft dogfighting in the
skies, aliens here on earth, the inside of an alien mothership, and lots of
suspense. This is a great roller-coaster ride of a movie.
That's not to say it doesn't have it's problems. The plot isn't exactly new.
Some scenes seem to be "inspired" from several other films including the
Star Warstrilogy, The Right Stuff,War of the Worldsand many of the
disaster films from the 70s. The music, which is good, just seems to be
poured on a little too much at times. Also, Randy Quaid plays a drunk in the
film who claims aliens kidnapped him several years ago. Yet, even though
there are aliens running around and alien ships are destroying the planet,
whenever Quaid mentions that he was kidnapped everyone acts like 'Yeah,
yeah, sure you were, ok whatever," and then roll their eyes like he's crazy.
But, all of these things are trivial because as I said before, this is the
greatest summer movie ever.
To be a successful summer movie (or any movie for that matter) the film
needs to make you forget your troubles and entertain you. ID4 succeeds
fantastically. For two and a half hours you will completely forget about
what's going on in your life and be completely engrossed in the lives of the
people on the screen. ID4 needs to be seen in a theater to be appreciated
because it will likely lose most of it's impact on TV. Director Roland
Emmerich completely redeems himself after the dreadfully boring Stargate.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Author
Lewis Butler
ID4 is a movie with something for everyone.  It has a large cast of
characters, so there's plenty of people to identify with.  The plot is
basic and simple: Aliens finally come, and they're not friendly.  The movie
starts with the alien mothership's arrival, a huge ship 1/4th the size of
the moon.  The first half-hour is all about the arrival and Earth's
reaction to it.  Then things start getting messy.
The plot is thin, but adequate.  Before humanity is completely
exterminated, we have to find a way to win against superior technology.
Seemingly, we don't have a chance.  The Alien ships are bigger, more
powerful, and they have some sort of energy shield that we can't penetrate.
It's going to be tough.
Bill Pullman plays the only completly unbelievable character in the movie,
an American President who is not a political weasel, but a fairly young
ex-fighter pilot hero of the Gulf War, politcally naive.  A man of honor and
ethics.  Basically, he plays a President the exact opposite of our current
canidates if they were merged into one.  That said, he's a convincing
character, and you can't help liking him.  He gets the audience on his side
when he announces that he is staying in Washington DC even after the 15
mile wide alien spaceship (one of 30) takes position directly over the
White House.  He send the vice-president and the cabinet to Norad.  Of
course, we've seen the White House get blown up in the previews...
A lot of people die in this movie, obviously.  But while it could have been
a lot of faceless people, the filmmakers take the time to introduce us to a
few of them.  It gives the movie a little bit of an edge and prevents it
from becoming completely silly summer escapism.  It's still mostly that,
don't be deceived, but there's enough there to keep you going.
One of the things I enjoyed about this film was that it made an effort not
to ignore the rest of the world.  Yes, it's an American film about
Americans, but there are just enough cutaways to other parts of the world
so that we know what's happening.  And though we don't see them, the
rest of the world is fighting their own battle, with just a little bit fo
help from the Americans.
There are many nice touches throughout the film, and many references,
somtimes oblique, to other films.  Look for Randy Quaid late in the film
doing a scene from... well, that might be considered a spoiler.  You'll
know it when you see it.
Performances are solid all the way around.  Some of the highlights are Will
Smith, playing a fighter pilot; Judd Hirsch as Jeff Goldblum's father;
eff Goldblum as a computer geek; and Brent Spinner as a xenobiologist or
soemthing whose been locked away underground for 30 years or so.  Pullman,
Goldblum, and Smith form the core cast of the film.
It is easy to dismiss this as "just another summer movie."  But I would
remind people of some other, recent, summer movies.  HUDSON HAWK.  THE LAST
ACTION HERO.  BEVERLY HILLS COP III.  TANGO AND CASH.  DIE HARD II.  Get
the point?  While this may not be a "great" movie, it is exactly what it
wants to be, entertaining.  It is very entertaining.
And the effects.  I haven't even mentioned the special effects, and this
movie is loaded with them.  Still, what is there to say?  We live in a time
where special effects in movies are so good it's really only worth
discussing them when they are poorly done.  They are not poorly done.  They
are spectacular.  The most impressive effects are the ones involving the
destruction of the various cities.
See it, it is the best "summer" movie in a lot of summers.  Better, even,
than TRUE LIES.
Distribution of this message by Microsoft, its subsidiaries, or its
software shall constitute a violation of my copyrights.  Microsoft may
license copyrights to my messages, for distribution only, for the sum of
$1,000 US per week.
--
kreme@cerebus.kreme.com   1015 South Gaylord, Denver, CO 80209 #100
WWW URL ">http://www.nyx.net/~kreme>
[303/722-2009] Vox
[303/777-2911] Data

Author
Alex Brenner
Dir: Roland Emmerich
Will Smith  Bill Pullman  Jeff Goldblum  Harvey Fierstein  Harry Connick Jr.
   At the risk of labouring an already overstressed point, I felt that it
would be worth adding my tu'penny ha'penny worth to the debate surrounding
this vastly popular film.  It seems to be the case now that every year the
moviegoing public selects one or two films and makes them massively
successful, and they are, largely without exception poor, if not downright
dire.  Last year we had the tedious, contrived 'Batman Forever,' the year
before that the characteristically vapid 'Lion King' and the pernicious
and subversive 'Forrest Gump,' and then before that, 'Jurassic Park.'  It
is saying something about a given group of films when dramatically the
most successful of their number is that saccharine and manipulative
dinosaur epic.  And, unsurprisingly, given that it was moulded by the same
hands which gave us the terrible 'Stargate,' 'Independence Day' is not
going to change any of that.  Before I launch into my list of objections,
firstly let me state that this is not a bad film in the class of 'Benji:
The Hunted' or 'Spy Hard.'  It possesses certain moments which a viewer
can enjoy, and as a whole it is not what one might categorise as
offensively bad.
   However, much has been made of the many ludicrous moments in the script
which betray the creator's uninterest in really suspending disbelief.  My
personal favourites include the bizarre idea that one could upload a virus
into an alien computer, the outrageous fluke of the First Lady a)surviving
and b)being found, and the notion that the fire that consumed a whole city
might somehow become channelled into a tunnel, which might vaguely be
considered reasonable if it were not for the clear portrayal of someone
surviving by hiding in a little side door.  Preposterous: whoever allowed
these into the final script needs to have his powers of discrimination
substantially upgraded.
   Still, one might be prepared to forgive this of the film.  After all,
amidst a hostile invasion by belligerent super-aliens, one might need a
little light relief.  The film does not let the critic off so lightly,
however: there are deeper problems with the film than that.  'Independence
Day' is extremely derivative.  Every five minutes I found myself being
reminded of other films, usually bad ones: 'Apollo 13,' 'Star Trek
6/Generations,' and, God forbid, 'Stargate.'  Upon consideration, it seems
that Emmerich is seeking to broaden the appeal of the film by nodding at
certain genre conventions.  Unfortunately, these nods inevitably lack
conviction, and thus the film assumes a patchy 'jack-of-all-trades and
master of none' aspect.  An example: as the film nears its climax, Jeff
Goldblum's character suddenly becomes very concerned about the
environment.  This is a difficult subject to handle without coming across
as glib or manipulative, but here it is such a momentary consideration
that it really opens a window on the director's technique.  Imagine: 'Gee,
the punters like environmental issues ... how can we squeeze it in?  Ah-ha
... ' (n.b. this goes some way also towards illustrating the difference
between a film like this and 'Mission: Impossible.'  For all the latter's
faults, it is undoubtedly the work of a man who knows his trade, whereas
'Independence Day' is in the main never more than workmanlike; where
'Independence Day' is derivative, 'Mission: Impossible' is allusive). 
Another example might be found in the use of homosexuality.  Not only does
fighter jock Will Smith have a boyfriend, which seems at odds with
Airforce regulations, but Harvey Fierstein is also allowed to be his
rampant, camp self.  Again, one gets the sense that, rather than there
being any honesty on Emmerich's part, he instead is winking
conspiratorially at Tarantino fans and those who feel that there should be
a more full representation of homosexuality on film - without actually
sympathising with their causes.  It all appears to be terribly cynical to
me.
   These are still gripes, momentary complaints rather than criticisms
about the work as a whole.  These are yet to come: there is little
question that the film is generally jaundiced.  With the exception of the
effects sequences, moer of which later, the film is subject to a terrible
defocussing of dramatic intensity.  Where the film should grip, it bores. 
There are several possible reasons for this.  Firstly, Emmerich makes
great play of giving his characters lengthy introductions, showing us
their private and public personae, giving us a little slice of their
lives, and so on.  Despite this, the protagonists are still merely
caricatures: the cocky fighter jock, the wholesome president, the
eccentric Jeff Goldblum intellectual from 'The Fly' and 'Jurassic Park.' 
Thus the audience instinctively becomes disinvolved in their condition;
there is no desire to empathise and thus to become infused with the
tensions and emotions of the characters.  We simply observe their actions,
always very aware that we are watching a film.  Secondly, the film has
little sense of pace: it ambles along, quite content to deliver an effects
shot every so often, while the rest of the time is spent delivering
shallow moralistic melodrama.  The real problem that denies the film any
power or impact is that is simply not awe-inspiring enough.  Any film
which takes something unusual or remarkable as its centrepiece should
retain a sense of wonder from start to finish.  Even those films whose
central themes are invested elsewhere should probably aim to found their
drama on a viewer's enthrallment with event and setting as something
significant.  Take 'Twelve Monkeys,' a film whose ending is set in a very
mundane location, and yet that setting is invested with so much before it,
and is so removed from the ordinary by events that have previously
occurred, that the viewer is absorbed into the whole situation.  Film is
inevitably concerned with an aesthetic projection of something a little
strange (unless one is going to see one's own biopic), and so it is a
shame to render the whole process profane, as in 'Independence Day.'  As a
final illustration, compare 'Independence Day' with 'Star Wars.'  Whereas
the latter performed the same feat as the former (only with vastly greater
force) by having a very spectacular spaceship opening, it retains that
sense of the spectacular until its climax, weaving an epic tale with
wonder upon wonder, until by the end the audience is left positively
overflowing with received sensation.  'Independence Day,' on the other
hand, makes its wonders seem very ordinary, until by the end, one is
simply accepting the inwards of the mother ship, or some fantastic battle
scene, as par-for-the-course.  Given that these are really the film's only
selling point, it seems inevitable that the film will become resigned to
mediocrity, as it possesses no sense of diminuendo or crescendo, merely
jolting from a loud bit to a quiet bit, thus losing any kind of dramatic
contrast.  Unfortunately, the film to which it must be compared is 'Star
Wars,' which reveals 'Independence Day's' epic pretensions as stillborn. 
Another point which seems incongruous: why are the protagonists of
Independence Day not more awed themselves?  It makes sense to merely
accept intergalactic war when it is part of one's life, as in, you guessed
it, 'Star Wars,' but when one is faced with something so profoundly alien,
the human psyche would be much more given to trauma than is portrayed in
'Independence Day.'  Exploration of such could have enormous dramatic
potential: a good delineation of the terror and fear, paranoia and horror
that a hostile alien attack would engender could have made the film much
more successful, but instead the characters merely bumble through, taking
the whole thing very much in their stride, Will Smith at one point
cheerfully bopping an alien on the nose.  Well, damnit, if the characters
aren't gripped by proceedings, then why the hell should I be?
   Unfortunately, the nature of the film and its publicity only
exacerbates these problems.  Having been stunned by the trailer, one sits
through the movie, undistracted by anything else, waiting for the next
effect shot.  That is no way to watch a film, but the whole 'Independence
Day' phenomenon, film included, leaves one with little choice.
   Now, having severely criticised the film, there are a few good points,
as I said earlier.  Pullman, Smith and Goldblum make sympathetic,
watchable leads, and the special effects are, of course, stunning,
unusually so, even in this day and age.  This largely not because of any
particular technical brilliance, though that is present, but instead
because of their amazing visual flair.  Some of the sequences do stand
comparison to 'Return of the Jedi' or 'The Abyss' (the  special edition,
not the vastly inferior original release).  The jet strike scenes' thrill
comes from a real sense of motion, and there are some scenes in which a
ship hovers above ground, while an unholy battle takes place in its
shadow, which are stunning, providing the film's only true moments of real
emotion, sending a genuine awed shiver down the spine.  What a pity, then,
that the special effects director's sense of visual style is so much
better than Emmerich's: the contrast between these battle scenes and the
rest of the film is sometimes really pretty shocking.  And, you'll already
have seen most of these scenes in the trailer.
   As a final point of denigration, the score is truly terrible.  Where it
should be unnoticable, it is intrusive, where it should be ominous or
emotive, it lapses into fanfare.  The film has enough problems without
some of its only good moments being spoiled by some marching brass band.  
   So, like 'Jurassic Park,' it has Jeff Goldblum as that eccentric
intellectual, an awful score, it is dramatically pathetic, and it has
enough in it to make a fantastic trailer.  'Jurassic Park,' at least, was
great cinema, if weak anything else.  'Independence Day,' then, comes
across as something of a poor man's 'Jurassic Park:' an impressive feat of
mediocrity.

Author
Christopher Null
     INDEPENDENCE DAY marks the glorious realization of what, for me, has
been a nearly 25 year wait.  Countless prayers have gone unanswered, but on
this day, I have finally witnessed on screen what I have only dreamt of all
my life, for this film features the complete and total destruction of the
city of Houston through the use of nuclear weapons, *by the U.S.
government's own hand!*
     But watching my home town be blown away is only one of the charms of
ID4 (the film's hip moniker).  First there's the WAR OF THE WORLDS meets
STAR WARS meets THE RIGHT STUFF story, about a superior, marauding alien
force threatening to annihilate the human race (and almost succeeding).
And an all-star cast of freedom fighters (more on them later).  Director
Roland Emmerich, who redeems himself for the idiocy of STARGATE, and who
isn't afraid to kill off the good guys.  Some dazzling visuals.  Loud sound
effects.  *Plus* every "Star Trek" and "X-Files" fan in town in the
audience.  What more do you want?
     Character-wise, we are peppered with a litany of names and faces, all
of whom are surprisingly easy to keep straight, thanks to Emmerich's
jumping around in the setting.  Will Smith does his BAD BOYS "2001"
character.  Bill Pullman recalls Michael Douglas's AMERICAN PRESIDENT.
Jeff Goldblum:  see JURASSIC PARK.  Randy Quaid, Harvey Fierstein, Robert
Loggia... we pretty much know what to expect from these folks.  And while
they may seem a bit hackneyed at times, especially with their clich=E9-ridde=
n
dialogue, there's enough life left over to make everyone interesting.  (But
why does everyone seem to have a romance sub-plot going on?)
     And yes, maybe the plot/theme about how a few Americans banding
together can stop a vastly superior invading force, end racial discord, and
ensure world peace and harmony is a bit much, but *so what?*  If you can
suspend disbelief enough to accept an alien ship 1/4 the size of the moon
is attacking earth, you can accept the Give Peace a Chance bit.  Think:
the director is a German!
     Okay... some of the effects are a bit cheesy, too, which doesn't mix
well with the really good ones.  (The residue of people laughing *at* (not
with) the final scene on July 2 really hurts the power of the opening scene
on July 3 -- New York City in ruins, the Statue of Liberty laying
half-submerged on its side.)  Just let these crummy effects go.  Understand
that much better ones are on the way.
     Nitpicking?  Who, me?  Yes, but this time I had a lot of fun on the
ride.  The whole film is tasty, even the unintentional cheese.  Be warned,
the movie is 2 hours & 20 minutes long, so pack a picnic basket.  But I
promise it'll be an excellent trip.
     And remember:  in space, no one can hear a frying Houstonian scream.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Vince Deehan
Directed by Roland Emmerich
Written by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Cast:  Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell,
Judd Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid and Robert Loggia.
I had been meaning to see INDEPENDENCE DAY for the past few weeks and so it
was with some degree of excitement that I went along to probably the biggest 
screen in London's West End to see it last week.  I thought it would be great 
to see it on such a large screen.  Unfortunately, the seat I had was so near 
the front that I may well have been sitting at my local small screen cinema. 
Oh well, I guess I should have got a seat a bit farther back !
In ID4 (as I will refer to the film from now on) the story is simple : aliens 
try to destroy planet Earth and the US leads the fight to save the world. 
That's about it really. I could go through the various characters and explain 
their part in the plot but this seems superfluous.  This is after all, a 
special effects movie not a character driven movie.  I have no problem with this
set up.  Although I do prefer films with solidly played and written characters,
most of us need to lighten up from time to time and watch a big, loud action
movie.  
The problem with ID4 was that I expected to be on the edge of my seat 
throughout the whole movie. I thought it would be a rollercoaster ride of a
film with lots of tension and excitement. It wasn't.  To be brutally honest, 
in the final half hour I was fighting a constant battle to stay awake. It was
a *real* struggle for me to keep my eyes open, so strong was my urge to just 
doze off.  The fact that I lost my concentration during the final reel, which 
should really have been the most exciting part of the film, says a lot to me 
about the effectiveness of this film. 
The main problem with ID4 and the main cause of my sleepiness is the simple 
fact that I couldn't get over the constant realisation that much of what I was 
seeing on the screen is all computer generated, state-of-the-art high tech 
graphics, and therefore it requires that the viewer must suspend common sense 
and be excited and in awe of the images on the screen.  I'm sorry but I 
couldn't really feel any sense of danger when Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum are 
shown flying towards the enormous mothership, when you know that the mothership
is just something that has been created on a computer (or whatever) and was 
superimposed after they had filmed their scene.  
I don't wish to imply that all special effects leave me cold, because this 
isn't true. I am saying however that the much hyped effects in ID4 did leave 
me cold and therefore made the film an interminable bore.
The one scene I enjoyed was the alien autopsy scene.  I don't mind admitting 
that I literally jumped out of my seat with fright, when they started to 
cut into the alien. Boy, was I embarrassed !  A classic horror film moment 
that really got me !
The acting in the film was generally adequate, nothing special.  The actors 
let the special effects take centre stage, which from my point of view was a 
mistake.  This was hardly the fault of the actors since they had to make
do with shallow characters and uninspiring dialogue.  Bill Pullman, who is 
one of my favourite actors, played a President who was said (at the start of 
the film) to be weak and he did what he could within the confines of the 
script.  The script called for a bland President and this is what Pullman 
provided.  Such a waste of his talents.  Will Smith gave a workmanlike 
performance and showed not a glimmer of his genuine acting ability which was 
shown in his excellent performance in SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION (anyone who 
hasn't seen this film should check it out).  The sooner Will Smith gets 
another proper serious acting role, the better.  Judd Hirsch was the best 
thing in the movie.  His funny and touching performance as Jeff Goldblum's 
father was very entertaining.  The other really good performance was from 
Brent Spiner who was a joy as the mad Scientist looking after the Roswell UFO. 
His very appearance was funny, and he had great presence in the few scenes he 
appeared in.  I am barely familiar with his work in STAR TREK:TNG, but I was 
very impressed with his entertaining performance in ID4.
Although I didn't enjoy ID4 I can appreciate the amount of work that went 
into it and I know that many people will enjoy it.
Review written on Sunday 22 September 1996 by Vince Deehan 
e-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk

Author
David Roche
     Why, oh why, do I always believe the hype? Any time that a big big
BIG movie is announced, I get so excited, thinking that this is
gonna be a GREAT one! Oh yes, this is gonna be a classic, dammit!
     I honestly don't remember the last great movie I've seen.  Hell,
I'll settle for a good one! These days, it seems as though the only
movies that satisfy are the low-budget, no-name flicks.  They have real
characters, genuine plots, and visual beauty un-enhanced by computers.
     Last night, my sweetie and I went to see "Independence Day"...  I
was really excited about it, considering the amount of positive press
it's been getting.  The covers of Time AND Newsweek featured it, so we
both thought it had to be worth all the fuss.
     It wasn't all bad, though.  The first half hour was fairly well
done, although I thought that there were too many "Poseiden
Adventure"-type characters being introduced.  This movie is essentially
an Irwin Allen disaster flic without Shelley Winters, which is, in my
opinion, a good thing.
     Anyhow, once we've gotten to know the series of cliched characters (the 
well-meaning US president who's thought of as a wimp, the drunken vietnam vet 
living in a trailer, the wife of a fighter pilot who just happens to be an 
exotic dancer, and so on and so on...), a bunch/flock/herd/
fleet of alien vessels appear in the skies over most major world cities.
     Then the fun begins.  As the aliens, who turn out to be bad news,
decide to destroy the cities above which they're hovering, we're
treated to some amazing special effects.  And then...  when the
destruction ends, we're left with 90 more minutes to think about what
we just saw. 90 minutes or so of every major movie cliche, all rolled
into one movie.  From mock patriotic speeches, to the death of the
president's wife, to the dog that just BARELY makes it to safety during
the invasion, to...oh, I can't go on...
     If anybody reading this is a fan of bad movie cliches, I'd be
really interested in hearing how many you may have counted.  I'm
guessing there have to be at least 50 of them.  I groaned at the part
where the US president, in the presence of an alien invader, gets a
headache suddenly, and manages to learn exactly what the aliens' plans
are through some kind of telepathy! How damned convenient, hmm?! What a
stroke of luck!
     But my very favorite, and least favorite, moment occurs when the
character played by Jeff Goldblum, decides how to destroy the alien
invaders....
     Now LISTEN to this one! Goldblum decides that if the humans could
somehow get aboard the alien spacecraft, they could simply upload a
computer virus in order to take down the aliens' shields...  It's just a
matter of convenience that the humans have a perfectly operational
alien spacecraft and a person willing to fly it into the motheship.  So
Goldblum and Will Smith (who is fun in the movie...best thing about it)
fly into the mothership, at which Goldblum presses a key and uploads the
virus to the alien's main computer (I guess even aliens use
IBM-compatibles...or maybe he just transferred some kind of flu
virus...that'd make more sense.).  To assume that the audience for a
modern sci-fi picture would be dumb enough to accept such a banal plot
device is insulting to me! Even IF these aliens used what we call
"computers", isn't it ridiculous to think that someone could press one
key and access them immediately? Especially considering they must use a
different language, different materials, different everything.  And
besides, even if I were to accept such ridiculous BS, don't you think an
advanced civilization which has mastered spaceflight to such an
extent, would have a damn program installed to ward off computer
viruses!! My old piece of junk Amiga computer even had a virus
checker!!!!
     I give up.  This is obviously not a review, you're thinking.
You're right.  It's an appeal to film makers to please make movies
which challenge our intelligence.  And it's an appeal to film-goers to
avoid such mindless drivel, or at least to tell others what you thought
of it.
     If ANYONE out there feels as I do about this film, please write
me...  I'm so pissed, I'm considering starting a USENET group devoted
to ranting about bad movies...
Oh, by the way, out of 5 virii, I give this movie a rating of 1 virus.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
Plot synopsis: (are you trying to tell me you don't know?)  Slimy
and easily detestable aliens aliens come to Earth and kill a lot of
extras.  After the main characters have finish vacillating, they
kick alien butt.  Fin.
In case you're wondering, I was one of two people on the
planet who didn't see "In-duh-pendence Day" at the cinema in
1996.  The other was Xing!-Kao!, a Bushman who was lost in the
wilds of the Serengetti for most of the year.  Having just seen
the aforementioned film on laserdisc, and given it's about to
appear on video, and as Xing!  has just made his way back to
civilisation, it seems appropriate to reflect on the worth of
"In-duh-pendence Day".
To pre-empt myself with the verdict, "In-duh-pendence Day" is
nothing special.  It is not, as some have proclaimed, "the worst
movie ever made", nor is is quite worthy of the moniker "IQ4".
What it is, is a minor and humourless SF piece with delusions of
grandeur, hyped beyond all reason and lumbered with some very
unsubtle and nasty subtexts.
It's pointless to recount the many plot holes - other have
done so thoroughly.  But we are not just talking about outrageous
contrivances or coincidences (i.e.  after the attack the USA is
apparently only populated by a dozen characters who can't help
but trip over each other) or handwaving (i.e.  the famous
Mac-compatible alien mothership, obviously using AOCE), but
serious logical problems.  (What is powering the captured alien
scoutship at the end?  Why do the aliens need to broadcast a
countdown?  Don't they have clocks?  How does two characters
escape from a panicked New York and get to Washington in 6 hours?
The military are short on pilots for their aircraft, which goes
against all logic and evidence.)  The scriptwriters obviously did
not care or assumed the audience wouldn't.
It is also too simple to blame Roland Emmerich.  He is not a
great director but "Universal Soldier" and "Stargate" at least
have parts that work, even work well.  He is just plain out of
his depth here, trying to control this sprawling mess.  Neither
do the actors deliver: Mary McDonnell is the most chipper
terminally-ill person you've ever seen ("You're supposed to be
dying, stop smiling damnit!")  and Jeff Goldblum sleepwalks
through his role.  Two hours of Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid
overacting their Jewish grandfather and Vietnam vet looney roles
respectively, suggests most strongly that they should have been
fired at the aliens in retaliation.  Special mention should be
made of Harry "no soul" Connick Jr, who normally makes a living
pretending to be a black musician and here pretends to be a black
fighter pilot.  Even the usually reliable Bill Pullman, as the
US President, looks distinctly uncomfortable.  His lips move,
sounding out a stirring speech.  What you actually hear is him
saying "Uh, bad alien!  Go away!".  When Brent Spiner appears in
a thankless cameo as a boffin, you have hopes that Jonathan
Frakes will show up in the role of the alien mothership.  Alas,
no.
No, the only people who really did their work for
"In-duh-pendence Day" were the marketing experts and the SFX
people and they do deserve a lot of credit.  Unfortunately, much
of the power of the special effects is lost on the small screen
but they are still passingly impressive.  Also effective are the
action scenes, which are at least noisy, energetic and colourful,
if too infrequent.
But most disturbing are several themes graunched into the
movie.  The most blatant of this is a clumsy pitch at American
patriotism, replete with constant images of flags waving and
national monuments.  At its extremes this becomes hilarious, with
a US flag on the stage curtain at a strip bar, booming theme
music that sounds like nothing so much as "Deutschland,
Deutschland, Uber Alles" and the combined military of the non-US
world sitting in the desert waiting for "the Americans" to give
directions.
More subtle but unmistakable is the constant reinforcement of
traditional sex roles.  Goldblum's prissy effeminate boss is
shown to be a mama's boy and a coward before being killed.  With
the menfolk rushing around and fighting aliens, the women are
left with little to do, asides from mind the children and look on
admiringly.  Those that have a man are reunited with them and
plight their troth.  Those that don't, die.  Goldblum's
eco-conscious SNAG is triumphantly transformed into a
cigar-chomping Real Man by the end, come back to claim his woman.
This, in my mind, is the most disturbing thing about
"In-duh-pendence Day".
At the end, one is left an impression of clumsiness. There are
certainly worse films, more illogical ones, worse scripted ones,
dumber ones.  But rolled into one long-winded parcel - that's
ID4.  [*/misfire] and a remake of "This Island Earth" on the Sid
and Nancy scale.
"Independence Day"
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Starring Jeff Goldblum, Judd Hirsch, Randy Quaid, Bill Pullman,
   Will Smith, Mary McDonnell, Margret Colin, Vivica Fox, Brent Spiner,
   Robert Loggia, Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr.
Released 1996.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse

Author
P. Clark
Independance Day is one of this summer's great combination movies. 
The film features plenty of fast action, heartfelt laughs, sweet
romance and go-get-em-tiger heroism.  In addition, you could take
a kid to see it because there just isn't any gratuitous gore.  I
think the rest of the industry could take a lesson from this one: 
Guess what, Charlie, you don't have to have flying limbs to make
'em jump out of their seats!
I have heard other critics making mock of the romance elements in
this film, and I think that they need a reality check.  If one day,
God help us, anything like ID4 did happen I know I'd be real
worried about my family, even if I was president of the USA. 
Bill Pullman plays the Pres and I thought he was refreshing, a
brave man who is more interested in the welfare of the human race
than in the next popularity poll.
Will Smith puts in an amusing performance as a fighter pilot who
turns out to have serious guts.  Again, I don't think his craziness
is entirely illogical; after all, Marines have long been known for
being out-of-the-ordinary.  Maybe an authentic Marine would say
Will's a softie, but I still think real men are allowed to have
feelings.
Jeff Goldblum plays a brilliant if unambitious MIT brain, who has
lost his wife (Margaret Colin) to the glamor of Washington.  Three
cheers for the not-so-average heroism he displays as he fights his
way upstream into an evacuating city to bring vital news to the
powers-that-be, and then goes along on the mission to deliver the
killing blow to the aliens.  At least his wife has the brains to
realize what she nearly lost and lets him know how she feels before
it's too late.
Judd Hirsch is Jeff's crusty dad, Randy Quaid a drunken ex-fighter
pilot, Brent Spiner a half-mad scientist who's been underground too
long.  All three put in believable and humourous performances.  
Um, yeah, I did say believable.  ID4 itself requires that all
disbelief be left at the door.  We have to swallow a really amazing
string of coincidences (you'll know what I mean when you see the
movie) but Hollywood has long required that of its audience.
What is important is that ID4 is in something of a unique class, a
feel-good thriller (?!), and since I am capable of making a leap of
faith, I enjoyed it.  If you're not too demanding that a film be
high art, you will too.
http://www.accent.net/tmc   (At the Movies)

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Nothing has been more hyped this summer than the 
release of Independence Day. The trailer has been playing 
non-stop for months, long enough for me to be able to recite Will 
Smith's soundbite of "I'm just a little anxious to get up there and 
kick E.T.'s ass, that's all," in my sleep. And the movie theater I 
went to was so crowded there were actually cops directing traffic 
out of the parking lot. It was playing on three screens with a line 
around the corner and the first showing sold out. With the only 
other opening-day competition being the John Travolta melodrama 
PHENOMENON (which looks pretty Tra-volting to me), I knew 
they were all there for INDEPENDENCE DAY, probably the movie 
event of the decade so far.
        But is it worthy to be hailed as an event? In two 
words -- yes. It may not have the artistic merit of a SCHINDLER'S 
LIST, but this is the common man's classic, mainstream 
entertainment that draws average audiences together and 
envelops them completely. INDEPENDENCE DAY is a huge-scale 
epic worthy of the hype, one which shamelessly exploits those last 
lingering shreds of patriotism we all still have. It's STAR WARS plus 
ALIEN plus TOP GUN with hints of 70's ensemble disaster movies 
like THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE and AIRPORT (but I'm not 
holding the last two against them).
        There are no huge stars in INDEPENDENCE DAY -- no 
Arnold protecting Vanessa Williams or Sean Connery breaking into 
Alcatraz, not even any names above the title. Instead we get 
second-string stars like Will Smith as an overly brave fighter pilot, 
Jeff Goldblum as the earth-friendly genius (pretty much the same 
character he played in POWDER), Bill Pullman as the President, 
Randy Quaid as the eccentric crop duster who claims a previous 
alien encounter and Judd Hirsch of "Taxi" as Goldblum's 
stereotypical Jewish father.
        Then there are the brief screen-time casualties like Harvey 
Fierstein, who vamps his way through the first reel, Harry Connick 
Jr. as a fellow fighter pilot and Brent "Data" Spiner, a government 
scientist who gets attacked by an alien who must have heard his 
"Old Yellow Eyes" loungeact album on K-Tel records. (Hell, _I'd_ 
travel the galaxy to kill Spiner after listening to that.) Countless 
others die, of course, when the giant hovering spacecrafts show 
up over New York, Washington, L.A. and the other key Earth 
cities.
        The first third of INDEPENDENCE DAY, the most 
chilling and compelling part of the movie, is devoted to the arrival 
of the spacecrafts over Earth. Scenes of mass panic and destruction 
on a huge scale abound, with strategic shots of skyscrapers 
crumbling, giant fireballs engrossing the masses and even the 
White House exploding ("Hillary! Chelsea!"). Goldblum, a cable 
technician, is the first to figure out that the aliens haven't come 
in peace, and intervenes accordingly. But that's just the 
beginning.
        The second day of our three day epic brings the first 
human retaliation attempts, centering around Bad Boy Will Smith's 
bloated-ego action hero techniques, which is when you remember 
you're still only watching a movie. As authentic as the INDEPENDENCE 
DAY visuals are, the biggest implausibilities are in the mostly 
one-note characters and how lightly they seem to take the news 
of impending global destruction, as if they'd already read the script 
and know things will be okay in the end.
        It's not a perfect movie by any stretch of the imagination 
but is such an incredible experience that you can easily overlook 
the rampant implausibility and dialogue which would in other 
circumstances seem laughable. In forty years, as the special effects 
become dated, the flaws will seem more obvious and INDEPENDENCE 
DAY may well join the Bad Movie Hall of Fame, but right now it's 
the best entertainment of the year. What it lacks in big-name draws 
or intelligence of plot it more than makes up for in visual effects and 
the collective anxiety it invokes over the fate of the characters, not to 
mention the planet.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Author
Ralph Benner
        Would INDEPENDENCE DAY be a better movie without all that Area 51 
bs? Did director Roland Emmerich and his co-writer Dean Devlin get their 
filler by watching those sci-fi nuts on Larry King's TNT special? (I 
confess to seeing it -- twice; anyone who imports a desk and uses the 
sunset in the near-Roswell desert as his backdrop is a showman deserving 
of an encore.) Would ID4  be more receptive without Bill Pullman mouthing 
perfunctory lines that flash in our heads before his cue? Without Randy 
Quaid's boozer-turned-hero? Without Will Smith a little too conveniently 
landing his chopper at his decimated base to be greeted by his gal pal? 
(Vivica Fox is, though, the prettiest black squeeze to grace movies in 
years.) Let's face it: like JURASSIC PARK, ID4 is just okay. We don't have 
to be movie addicts or snob technocrats to roll our eyes or turn from the 
screen when Quaid is on; enjoyable at the "suspend disbelief" level up to 
a point, we all probably begin to quietly mumble Oh no, they're not going 
to let him do that and sure enough Harvey Fierstein does his toxic 
schtick, and Oh God, it's another tiring mutation of Ridley Scott's aliens 
-- this time much smarter: they're hegemonic invaders. We're going to ID4 
to see the long-advertised special effects, which are, alternately, wowie, 
good and blurry. There's one huge collective disappointment: the mother 
space ship and its 15 mile-in-diameter babies. We never get near enough to 
them for clear-eyed views; just when we think we will -- like when one of 
the midget terrors comes out of its fiery CLOSE ENCOUNTERS cloud over San 
Francisco -- it's gone; this magnificent "Phenomena" isn't held long 
enough for us to perceive its paralyzing other-world majesty, what should 
be one of those "Wow!" moments that only movies can provide. And inside 
the mother ship, things get awfully hazy, we can't get a techno fix. (We 
get better views of the movie in the MVP licensing publication 
Independence Day, the Official Collector's Magazine.) The lack of the 
luxury to linger is a mistake; this movie is really all about the terror 
of technological awesomeness and in order to feel the fright and panic, in 
order to respond to what's pretending to be larger than we are, we need 
some realistic impressions -- we need to be convinced of the expensive 
razzle dazzle we're watching. On this level JURASSIC  PARK succeeds: if 
we're unavoidably aware of the mechanical contraptions and 
computer-generated effects, we're in awfully close proximity; we marvel at 
how Spielberg and his Merlinettes give their monsters a real charge. In 
ID4 we want to ooh and aah too, we want to get caught up in the War of the 
Worlds, yet we're detached -- we're watching FX that initially intimidate, 
only to become elusive to our senses; they stay "out there" for too long. 
(And sometimes the effects are shoddy, like the exteriors of the Air Force 
One model, and the aliens' humpy fighters look like those plastic HairWiz 
cutters you buy at Walgreen's.) Actually, the movie's trailer, which kept 
Fox from having to spend much money on ads, has been out there for too 
long: our politics aside, when the White House explodes, the audience I 
saw the movie with didn't cheer or react demonstrably in any way -- not 
like it was reported from theatres during first screenings. We've been too 
prepared for it; even people who haven't gone to the movies in years have 
the scene burned into ever-lasting memory. The explosion works against the 
picture in another way too: it's pop 'em sock 'em sci fi pyrotechnics but 
it's also pop culture debasement, maybe not too different from women's 
Stars & Stripes halter tops. (A wit who saw the movie early in its release 
observed, "Titsnflaggers who want a Constitutional amendment outlawing 
flag burning seem to be the ones hooting it up the most when the White 
House gets it.") What laughs there are come out of a peculiar 
embarrassment: I got a good one over the fact that there was little 
objection to blowing my town Houston to bits. No one will win any blue 
screen acting awards, with the exception of a possible Razzie nomination 
for Quaid. It's Jeff Goldblum's good luck to be cast in blockbusters; I 
still don't know why it's taking so long for him to play opposite Barbra 
Streisand -- their ethnic beauty should be able to ignite a raucous 
romantic comedy. Pullman's wonderfully deep-octaved voice helps, as does 
the "comeback kid" persona. Playing his Dee Dee Myers, Margaret Colin's a 
pleasant clone of Mary Louise Parker and Elizabeth Perkins. ID4 has made 
its virtual three hundred million dollar domestic gross in the same way 
JURASSIC PARK did -- by giving summer movie audiences the stories they 
love but movies they end up feeling indifferent about. A loving update of 
Ray Harryhausen's "Earth Vs. The Flying Saucers," it's not much more than 
a joint of Roswellian hemp from which outer space buffs can get a so-so 
buzz.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     In retrospect there was something positively refreshing about
George Pal's 1953 film THE WAR OF THE WORLDS.  Over the years we have
seen many alien invasion films in which the aliens come as seed-pods to
replace us, or they have an advance guard take over our minds, or they
seed our planet with alien vampires.  Sometimes they really are
friendly; sometimes they only pretend to be friendly; sometimes they
are nasty and hide out in swamps; sometimes they steal our scientists.
There are only a very small handful of films in which the aliens try
straight-ahead overwhelming us with sheer military power.  In most of
them the aliens equivocate by negotiating at some point as they do in
THE MYSTERIANS or EARTH VERSUS THE FLYING SAUCERS.  Unique among these
films, until now, has been THE WAR OF THE WORLDS in which the
implacable aliens arrive with incredible power and start to pound
humanity flat--no negotiation, no communication, no quarter given.
That is perhaps a very believable scenario for an alien invasion, but
since THE WAR OF THE WORLDS nobody has really wanted to tackle it in a
movie.  One reason it has not been done more often is that it would be
really expensive in terms of special effects to do it right, showing
scenes of mass destruction rather than telling the view about them.
And it would require a script that would have the courage to depict
whole population centers destroyed, showing thousands of people being
killed.  George Pal made a reasonable stab at that with his film, but
nobody has really tried it since.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin
apparently observed that film industry's visual technology has caught
up with that concept.  They also realized that the way was paved for
film like this by the success of the television program, "The X-Files."
Whatever convinced them that the time was right they now have a super-
hit of a film.
     A huge artificial object appears near the moon and start moving
toward Earth.  Without warning the skies over major cities go dark as
they are covered by mysterious cloud-banks.  From the cloud-banks
emerge city-sized flying disks, fifteen miles in diameter.  For six
hours they float in ominous silence.  Perhaps the best moments of the
script are the tension before the initial attack.  The script takes its
time, slowly revealing more and more about the alien ships.  The
script, which was co-authored by Dean Devlin who produced and Roland
Emmerich who directed, consciously mimics disaster film writing
introducing a large number of characters, most played by solid but
second string actors.  Bill Pullman plays a rather youthful President
of the United States is worried about his strong-willed but nice First
Lady Marilyn (Mary McDonnell).  He is aided by Constance (Margaret
Colin) whose ex-husband David (Jeff Goldblum) is a whiz with computers
but he is still working out his relationship with his cute but kvetchy
Jewish father Julius (Judd Hirsch).  Davis will soon find his fate
entwined with hotshot Air Force pilot Captain Hiller (Will Smith).
Most of the characters are developed only on the most superficial level
with the most touching relationship being that between David and his
father.
     Emmerich and Devlin freely admit that there is much in
INDEPENDENCE DAY that was inspired by other films.  They cite 1940s war
films and 1970s disaster films, but whole scenes seem to be lifted from
films like ALIEN and THE RIGHT STUFF.  In spite of the safe route of
borrowing from established films, the script does take some chances.
It is not many, but some characters the audience cares about get
killed.  While the script is heavy on coincidence and melodrama it
never fails to be fun.
     If this is not an intelligent film, it is not a really dumb one
either.  It is a big spectacular, almost two and a half hours, with its
share of script problems.  Much the same can be said of films like THE
TEN COMMANDMENTS or THE TOWERING INFERNO.  It is not intelligent, but
it is fun.  There is enough good to compensate for the negative points.
I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler
     There are a few of the ideas of the film that needed to be better
explained.  The aliens were here to steal out precious natural
resources, supposedly.  Our resources are valuable to us, but Earth is
no richer in resources than any other planet in the solar system.  It
is not at all clear to me why they wasted so much energy and resource
subduing a hostile native population.  It might have been better adding
a few words saying that they needed an atmosphere of oxygen to mine the
resources or that they as a policy first subdue any populations that
might be a threat before mining a solar system.  On the other hand,
perhaps it is better to leave them a little mysterious.
     Part of the problem is that the aliens are a bit too much like us.
They share our eyes, nose, mouth configuration, our five-fingered
hands.  This in spite of the fact that a daisy is a closer relative to
us than they are.  Not only are they too similar, their technology is
way, way too similar.  Humans can figure out how to fly craft
instrumented for their anatomy and designed by their psychology.  We
are able to write and run programs on their computers.  Isaac Newton
was much closer to us than they are in terms of mental processes and I
doubt that if he stumbled somehow on a modern PC it would be able to do
much with it without instructions.

Author
Mike Warner
For component summary, see http://www.id4.com
I'm testosterone overloaded and out for bear. Gentlemen, saddle up,
strap me in, and snap my head back. Whaa-- We're in an 8G power-dive
and suddenly the flaps are down. Oh, I'm sorry. Excuse me. I didn't
realize we had to cut to Will Smith's Significant Other shopping for
Huggies.  
Velocity Interruptus. Screenwriting Amateurus.
Margaret, what I lack in technique, I'll make up for in size.
Good versus Evil. Cowboys and Indians-from-space with a
state-of-the-art video treatment. How could I not like the White House
getting pulverized? You say Bill and Hillary are on the doorsteps? 
Look. If you're going to be the butt-kickingest high-velocity
fireworks show yet, then do it. Don't ALSO try to be Les Miserables.
When you've established a wake and we're all being sucked along at
mach 3, don't stop to smell the roses. 
Linear in time. Thank Christ. I don't think I could have handled
"Captain Steven Hiller: the Formative Years".  Localized in space.
Which is fortunate. If the story-tellers had been Stephen King fans,
we could have been saddled with following the Japanese Brady Bunch.
A story is a set of independent, parallel threads, with a camera
following each thread. A screenwriter must be able to switch between
threads without disrupting the velocity established by the preceding
thread. Trust me, If you don't maintain consistent velocity between
threads, the viewer gets pissed. ID4's screenwriters couldn't pull it
off. The movie had 20 minutes of disruptive sub-threading that should
have been edited out. Come to think of it, maybe these guys ARE
Stephen King fans.
Carpe diem, dudes. Instead, let's go with the most embarrassing
cliches we can remember. Hell, these guys didn't take Screenwriting
101. In the first class you learn: dont *tell* the audience; *show*
them. Example: Will Smith's incessant carping about how "bad" he is.
Yeh right, Will. You couldn't put a submission hold on the Avon Lady.
Again, Carpe diem, dudes. In the world of High Technology, these
screenwriters were in over their heads. But don't feel bad, boys. Most
screenwriters are. Also, many missed opportunities to delight with
things contrasting and unexpected. They should have pulled-in Quentin
Tarantino as a script consultant. In dialogue, Quentin knows about 
Seizing the Moment.
This is where ID4 excelled. They had some excellent clips and whetted
our appetites way in advance. Even if the thing had turned out to be
as bad as Eraser, the advertising momentum would have pinned the facts
in a match. The Marketroids rocked.
Will Smith [Captain Steven Hiller]. I got real tired, real quick of
hearing Will Smith tell me how bad he is. Smith's a wimp. Plus, he
can't act. But then, he's not an actor; he's a comedian who can't make
the transition. Should have hired Wesley Snipes.
Harry Connick Jr. [Jimmy]  Here's a musician who *can* make the
transition. His impersonation of The Reverend Jesse Jackson is the
high point of the film. This guy is dangerous. He can sing Frank
Sinatra better than Frank. Have you seen CopyCat? Read my lips: HCJ
will receive an oscar within the next 3 years.
Jeff Goldblum. [David Levinson] His verbal cadence and propensity to
expressive hand gestures are getting him typecast as a techie. See
Jurassic Park, Powder. Jeff's cool.
Judd Hirsch. [Julius Levinson] The film's other title is How The Jews
Saved Earth From Alien Invasion. Judd Hirsch's character is there to
remind us that Jeff is a Jew and that it's Jews who are saving our
ass--once again. 
Bill Pullman. [The President] Mis-cast. Bill, god bless his soul, is a
mainstream non-entity. You find his picture when you look up the word
"uncharismatic." He was pushing his envelope in The Accidental
Tourist. In ID4 he has one shining moment to prove to us that he can
act, AND ---. Sorry,Bill. You can't really act. See if Uncle Pully can
get you into the Carpet business.
Brent Spiner. [Dr. Okun] Mis-cast. Plus, he doesn't play a character,
he parodies one. I guess the Director went out with the Best Boys for
tacos. Spiner should have waited till Emmerich returned, because
Spiner apparently suffers from Judgment Deficit Disorder. Hell,
there's always the Next Generation residuals.
Randy Quaid. [Russel] He could have played the character, but the
Director was off with the Best Boys, so Quaid joined Spiner, who also
suffers from Judgment Deficit Disorder. In the director's absence,
Quaid played a stand-up comic parodying a drunk, something he does
about 80 percent of the time, anyway. He's getting a lot of practice.
And various space-takers who didn't quit their day jobs, hopefully.
What direction? I think Emmerich used some of his bloated budget money
to go to Disneyland. Couldn't he have waited until the movie ended?
There's always the chance that one of the actors would have stumbled
over him and he could have used that as an excuse to interject his
recommendations on characterization.  As Ace would say: loo-hoo-ser
Pretty much the whole gambit: modelling, compositing, computer
imaging, and so forth. I'm beginning to favor the theory that Bill
Pullman's character was actually an animatronic device. Hmmm. Anyway,
Models are cool. You can down-light a model so that it lacks detail.
That way the audience can't tell the blurry thing is a model. You can
do the same thing in Software, but Software Engineers are WAY into
proving that they can ray-trace better than god. Plus, they want you
to see every incredible detail of the texturing on the ten million
edge-softened polygons. You want me to blur what? Blur this.
Hell, with thirty-thousand dollars worth of Amiga/Video Toaster
workstations, networked together ala Babylon-5, they could have had
something viewable. Oh well. Why use what works when you have so many
Effects Studios familiar with what doesn't? 
Very few Movie Makers know how to use the power of Music to drive the
velocity and create emotional involvement. Michael Mann is the expert.
He proved his expertise in the Miami Vice series. If you want to
experience the power of Music to contribute to the effect the Director
envisions, check out the last ten minutes of Mann's masterpiece,
Manhunter.
In ID4, the Makers were either clueless or uninterested. They may have
been mesmerized by the Video and forgot about the Audio. Or maybe they
had to trim the budget someplace. In the end, when we finally figure
out how to take the Alien Octopi to the mat, a few power chords may
have been in order. 
Verdict: At least they didn't use Rap.
THX rules. Some of the low-end notes (the thuds) were quite inspiring.
Not bad, really. Some of the computer-generated explosions were a
little askew of the exploding models, but, hey, captive inertia
carries the audience by many of the flawed details.
Rating system : -4 to +4, where 0 = better than a blank screen, but
only if you smuggled-in your own candy.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Okay, I realize that my fellow critics are giving thumbs down to
INDEPENDENCE DAY (ID4), but I absolutely love it.  Although not as
pretentious nor as good STAR WARS, which is the show it most closely
resembles, ID4 is the best action and sci-fi thriller I have seen in a
long time.  It has devastation on a scale that is unmatched by any show
I have ever seen, and yet the film is so controlled that kids as young
as 7 should be able to see it and enjoy it as well as the adults.
     Since we were scared by the newspaper stories of the long lines at
ID4, we went on Saturday afternoon to see PHENOMENON instead.  When we
got there, the projector had broken so went over to ID4 where there
were long lines and people with umbrellas and ice chests waiting in the
heat of the parking lot.  To our surprise, most of these people were
coming early to buy tickets for later.  We bought tickets 10 minutes in
advance for the 5:25 show in one of the three theaters showing ID4 and
got almost our favorite seats - in the center 10 rows from the screen.
     I will only setup the plot and give some of the dialog so you can
get a flavor of the show, but without giving anything away.  Aliens
come in a huge planetary size home that is one quarter the diameter of
the moon.  From their home they dispatch a dozen spaceships that are
fifteen miles wide.  When these spaceships go overhead they are so
large they eclipse the sun forming dark ominous shadows over entire
cities.  Moreover, they look like flying visions of hell complete with
fiery clouds that portend the end of the world.
     Hollywood of late has two types of picture presidents.  One set of
movies has presidents who are AWOL as in EXECUTIVE DECISION and BROKEN
ARROW.  The other set are paeans to Bill Clinton as in THE AMERICAN
PRESIDENT.  Here for a change we have ex-fighter pilot President Thomas
Whitmore (Bill Pullman from WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING and RUTHLESS
PEOPLE) who is a reserved version of Teddy Roosevelt.  Although he is
about Clinton's age, pilot Whitmore is clearly not a Clinton clone as
Douglas was in THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT, and there is even a hint in the
movie that he is actually a Republican.  I liked Pullman's performance.
He is believably concerned for all of his people, and although
naturally a quite type, he is not afraid to lead and make tough
decisions.
     Jeff Goldblum plays the nerd role of satellite engineer and chief
code cracker David Levinson.  David's ex-wife Connie (Margaret Colin)
is the Chief-of-Staff to the president.  Judd Hirsch is David's father
Julius.  Julius is full of funny homilies as when he tells his son to
calm down on the drive to the capital, "What's the rush?  You think
we'll get to Washington, and it won't be there?"  Working in the TV
station with David is Marty Gilbert (Harvey Fierstein).  When he learns
that the aliens are on the way, he advises David as he is running to
the bomb shelter, "There is no shame in hiding," and then reflects,  "I
better call my mother."
     California is not treated with much respect in the movie.  As
Captain Steven Hiller (Will Smith) and his girlfriend Jasmine Dubrow
(Vivica Fox) are waking up, an alien ship is passing overhead which
makes their bed shake.  Steve asks, "Is that an earthquake?"  Jasmine
reassures him with, "not even a four pointer.  Go back to sleep."
After this is one of many great comedic scenes in the picture.  Steve
walks outside and looks right noticing his neighbor is leaving and then
as he looks all around he gets wide eyed realizing that everybody is
leaving.  When he figures out what is going on, he tries to reassure
Jasmine with, "Look, I don't think that they flew 90 billion
light-years here to start a fight."
     The people in LA are excited about the aliens coming.  This is
their kind of event.  One undulates in rapture, "Oh god, I hope they
bring back Elvis."  A California teenager uses the come-on line to a
girl in his pickup truck, "This may be your last night on earth.  Do
you want it to be as a virgin?"
     The serious lines are given to the president.  He holds a news
conference to proclaim, "the question of whether we are alone in the
universe has been answered."  The answer, of course, is troubling.
Later he tells the world that, "we can't be consumed by our petty
differences anymore."
     Even more than the funny script by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
and the precise and energetic direction by Roland Emmerich, what makes
the show burst with excitement are the special effects.  The power and
the scale of the effects outdoes the death star in STAR WARS and the
tornadoes in TWISTER.  Actually the picture has aspects of these shows,
plus many others (TESTAMENT, TOP GUN, BLADE RUNNER, DR. STRANGELOVE,
etc.), but is never derivative.  Everything here fills fresh, and yet
at its heart this is a classic sci-fi tale from the 50s.
     Okay, now is the time to address the plausibility issue.  If a
film is good enough, you can ignore a lot of unlikely material.  Up
until the solution is found to combat the alien invasion, I found the
story reasonably believable.  After that it became a bit tougher to
suspend disbelieve, but, hey, this is not a National Geographic special
afterall.
     The hellish colors that cinematographer Karl Walter Lindenlaub
comes up with work great.  The score by David Arnold is dramatic, and
it is probably worth buying the CD of it.
     My favorite actors in the show are Will Smith and Bill Pullman.
The first is hilarious and smart, and the second wise and brave.  For a
great little quirky character Randy Quaid plays crop duster Russell
Casse who claims to have been captured by aliens ten years earlier.
Watch how the writers tie that in with the rest of the story.  Many
other good minor characters including Robert Loggia as General Grey,
Mary McDonnell as First Lady Marilyn Whitmore, Brent Spiner as mad Dr.
Okun, and James Rebhorn as Secretary of Defense Nimziki.  Finally, the
ending is phenomenal.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY runs 2:22, and I am glad they did not trim it
down to make more money.  It is rated PG-13.  The amazing thing to me
was that I could have safely taken my 7 year old son Jeffrey to see it.
There is violence, but it is all of the non-threatening sci-fi variety.
If your kids can handle balls of flames and cars blowing up and if they
are not frightened at all by Star Wars, they are probably old enough to
see INDEPENDENCE DAY.  My guess is that most kids 7 and up will love it
as I did.  There is no sex, nudity, or bad language that I can
remember.  I give this enjoyable and incredible film my strongest
recommendation and top rating of ****.  I don't care what the other
critics that I respect say.  This is a great film, and I am happy to be
pushing it. 
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Big, stupid B-movie that would have been more fun if we could have
seen the strings from which the UFO models were hanging.
I waited a long time before codifying my feelings about INDEPENDENCE DAY, a
big, stupid movie that commanded a massive audience mostly by sheer
audacity. The trailers and promotional material for ID4 sold the flick on
one point: "In this movie, the world blows up. Come and see!"
Putting aside the basically reprehensible nature of this kind of hard sell,
what's left? An extremely expensive B picture that, because of its cost and
size and pretentiousness (yes, pretentiousness), isn't nearly as much fun
as it could have been. It's a surefire perpetual rental hit and frat-party
MST3K-style video keeper, but it's still incredibly dumb. (One of the
surest signs that Hollywood is losing its grip: MARS ATTACKS! which
post-dated ID4 and could have parodied that movie brilliantly, couldn't
even do *that* well. Figures.)
The plot is old, old, old. Big alien ships arrive and hover over our major
cities ("in exactly the same way that bricks don't" -- Douglas Adams). They
eventually start blowing everything up. (A very sarcastic underground-press
poster showed the shot of the White House getting blasted and the caption
PROOF OF ALIEN INTELLIGENCE.) Mankind finds a way to fight back. Everything
that hasn't been blown up in the first half of the movie is blown up in the
second half. The end. (At least until they decide to write "ID5".)
There are some moments throughout the movie, individual touches, that
garner a laugh or a shock. Will Smith's performance as a hot-dog pilot who
apparently seems to know how to fly alien spacecraft from having looked at
them is funny (and his monologue with an unconscious alien in the desert is
destined to become bumper-sticker material); he's probably the best thing
in the movie. But the movie as a whole is just impossibly stupid, a total
failure of real imagination. The effects are impressive, but they're
monolithic and unimaginative. (White House blows up. Empire State Building
blows up. And the picture of Lady Liberty, trashed, is more or less ripped
from PLANET OF THE APES. Et any number of ceteras.)
I mentioned pretentiousness. At various points during the flick, we're
allegedly supposed to have our sympathies enlisted for some sort of
patriotic revival, a feeling that good ole Ammurrican ingenuity will rise
up and remake the world once again. Give me a break. The low point of the
movie, in this vein, is a speech by Bill Pullman (playing a Clintonesque
[i.e., spineless?] president) which rather clumsily ties in the movie's
title with a rallying cry. I waited for someone to clobber him with a brick
and get on with it.
(Actually, maybe the real nadir was reached when the video game tie-in was
released a couple of weeks ago -- which is more enjoyable than anything the
*movie* has to offer.)
>From what I understand, a three-hour extended version of the movie will be
appearing sometime later this year on LaserDisc. I've been on trips to the
DMV that were shorter and less dimwitted.

Author
Bryant Frazer
What can you say about an alien invasion film with absolutely no sense of
danger or menace? Independence Day is an expensive film with ominous
production design, and while I was rooting for this movie to tear the roof
off the multiplex, nothing that happens on screen ever really gels.
Impressive as some of the special effects are -- and some of the shots
toward the end of the film are mighty impressive -- they're put to work in
support of a story that hardly seems to have been written, and a film that
hardly seems to have been directed. 
The concept is aces, though. On July 2, an alien mothership parks
somewhere this side of the moon and dispatches a squadron of 15-mile-wide
flying saucers to hover over the major cities of the world. The U.S.
government tries to send a friendly message, and flaky citizens from coast
to coast throw rooftop celebrations welcoming the alien visitors. The
aliens crash the party by decimating New York, Los Angeles, and Washington
D.C. On July 3, the remaining humans try in vain to fight back with
outmoded weaponry, until a charming nerd posits a devastating weakness in
the mothership's systems. On July 4, the counterattack begins. 
What we have here is a big movie, shot on location in Los Angeles, New
York City, and in the deserts of Arizona and Utah. The special effects are
big, featuring not just the destruction of some very large landmarks in
American cities, but also panoramic dogfights filling up the wide screen
with tiny spaceships and jet fighters. This is perhaps the year's most
ambitious movie, and it's almost hard to imagine that anyone in Hollywood
has been doing anything but post-production work on this behemoth of a
summer movie for the last three or four months. 
So how do you go wrong with a project like this? Well, for starters, maybe
you cast Bill Pullman as the President and ostensible leader of the
resistance. Oops. Pullman has seemed ill at ease in just about every role
he's ever played, and this one is no exception. Granted, he's playing a
character who's supposed to be adrift, but you have to wonder how this guy
ever got elected (if you read this as political commentary, maybe that's
the point -- but at the very least, couldn't Emmerich and Devlin hire a
speechwriter to come in and give the President's pep talks some rhetorical
juice?). 
Jeff Goldblum may think he's propping up his resume by continuing to play
the requisite blockbuster nerd, but I hope he's socking away the paychecks
for a rainy day, since this sort of noncommittal performance is likely to
lead him nowhere. Judd Hirsch plays Goldblum's tiresome father as written
-- a hopelessly overstated Jew, sort of like Billy Crystal with none of
the charm. Randy Quaid hams it up in a supporting role as the Lunatic Who
Makes Good, and Mary McDonnell is completely wasted as the First Lady.
(Ironic that James Duval plays a small role, since he starred in The Doom
Generation, Gregg Araki's black valentine to mainstream filmmaking, just
last year.)
The tremendously likable Will Smith, on the other hand, almost steals the
film away from the special effects team. This is the first time I can
recall Hollywood allowing a black man to be the unmitigated star of such a
high-stakes production, and Smith breaks the door wide open. In fact, I
can't help but think that Independence Day would have been a much better
movie if it had started and ended with his character. Instead,
Independence Day tries hard to be an epic, purporting to bring heroes
together across international borders and cultural lines even as it
nurtures its quintessentially American identity. 
Independence Day is a little more than two hours long, but not nearly long
enough to properly contain all of its own ideas. Fast pacing is a virtue
in this age of cgi effects and digital editing, but ID cuts its own
expository scenes so close to the bone that they can't take advantage of
their own strengths. The biggest exception comes during the film's
midsection, as Smith lugs an unconscious alien across white desert sands
to be incarcerated at a secret U.S. military base. Tirelessly exploiting
the American survivalist instinct, X-Files style SF paranoia, and outright
xenophobia, these scenes feature the movie's best ideas, its most honest
gags, and -- not coincidentally -- its most intense set piece, which
recalls Alien and John Carpenter's The Thing. 
Unfortunately, the tension level drops from there on out as the story
becomes more and more ludicrous and the special effects become more and
more of an end in themselves. If only there had been some way to bring
alien and human face to face one more time, in a stand-off that would
require a little more wit than punching keys on a keyboard, or clocking
the little alien dude once across the face, Independence Day might have
goosed its way to a more gripping conclusion. As it is, the movie shoots
its wad early on, running out of shocks and surprises way too soon. 
Most observations a critic can make are purely academic, of course, in the
face of what's sure to be overwhelmingly positive audience reaction. In
the absence of any other obvious science fiction or fantasy blockbusters,
Independence Day is a big release valve for the kind of tension that just
can't be loosed even by Schwarzenegger, tornadoes, and Tom Cruise (in that
way, it's a lot like Emmerich and Devlin's previous project, Stargate).
During the movie's big tearjerking scene, a woman in the row ahead of me
was sobbing loudly; at a big action payoff, the teenager sitting behind me
was shouting, I swear, "Yes, yes, yes! Yes! YES!" like Meg Ryan at Katz's
Deli. 
I know it might seem churlish to deny those pleasures, but for my eight
bucks, Independence Day just didn't deliver. (After the White House blew
up, I started checking my watch, which is never a good sign.) George
Lucas, Steven Spielberg, and hell, even James Cameron have made their
careers on this sort of picture -- the budget-blowing summer extravaganza.
And say what you will about the relative merits of True Lies or Jurassic
Park, those movies all come with points of view that demonstrate their
essential humanity. Terminator 2 is scary, funny, disgusting, and
exhilarating because Cameron is a formidable narrative alchemist. Jurassic
Park veers effectively from dinosaur terror to paternal tenderness because
Spielberg understands that the horrific can reveal the truly humane in all
of us (I suppose Schindler's List functions on the same principle). 
For all its history-making FX work, what Independence Day delivers is
mainly earthbound leftovers from the Star Wars trilogy wrapped around some
obvious Twister-style "human drama" that involves separated spouses who
still love each other. If those relationships are oddly devoid of passion,
it's for the same reason that a movie involving the murder of tens of
millions of people is oddly bloodless. In its misguided quest for
universal appeal, Independence Day is far too calculated, takes too few
risks, and shows us not nearly enough about the way human beings really
react under pressure. All the right buttons are being pushed, but
Independence Day doesn't have a point of view, or a beating heart. 

Author
Brian Koller
ID4 was an huge escapist summer hit.  The audience came
to see the White House blown up, and to see writhing aliens
get theirs.  If special effects are all you care about,
by all means check out this otherwise dumb-dumb movie.
Aliens place enormous spaceships over Earth's biggest cities,
and just leave them there, apparently for sustaining
dramatic tension.
Bill Pullman is the U.S. President.  Will Smith is a jetfighter
pilot.  Randy Quaid is a confused cropduster who claims to
have once been kidnapped by aliens.  His kids are amazingly
good looking.  Jeff Goldblum is a goofy nerd, Judd Hirsch
his goofy dad.
Goldblum, who just happens to be the only techno-wizard smart
enough to figure out when the Aliens will launch their attack,
just happens to have an ex-wife who is the President's
Chief of Staff, who just happens to be a young and gorgeous
woman.
One of Goldblum's co-workers is fluttery and cowardly and
has a raspy voice.  He wins the 1996 non-Academy Award
for most annoying supporting actor.
Finally, the long-promoted event arrives.  Aliens blow up the
White House, the Capital, make thousands of cars fly in the
air, killing the raspy voiced guy (no loss).  However,
Will Smith's perfect "10" stripper girlfriend is about the
city's only survivor, the only one smart enough to flee her
car and hide in an office located in a subway tunnel.
Afterwards, she leads a relief effort and finds and comforts
the injured first lady, whom the President apparently couldn't
find room for in Air Force 1.
Will Smith and his squadron attack an enemy spaceship.  All
the jets are destroyed except Smith's.  We get to see lots
of planes blow up.  Smith's plane runs out of gas (wouldn't
he have refueled before he left?) but he parachutes to
safety.  After some trash talk, he takes an alien hostage.
He soon encounters Randy Quaid, who gives Smith and alien
a ride.
Pullman learns that aliens did crash in Roswell, New Mexico,
in 1949.  He visits the top secret laboratory there, meeting
goofy mad scientist Brent Spiner.  Smith and alien also
show up, and meet the President.  Spiner operates on the
alien, which springs back to life (the operation is a success)
and attacks Spiner.  Pullman has a conversation with the
alien.  When the icky alien isn't polite, it is shot.
Smith commandeers a helicopter (apparently he can fly anything)
and thru ESP finds his girlfriend and the first lady,
who lives just long enough for a tender bedside moment with
Pullman.
Clever Goldblum somehow creates a computer virus that can
take down the alien shields, allowing counterstrikes.  Ever-handy
Smith learns to fly the alien spacecraft from the Roswell crash,
and docks with the mothership to allow passenger Goldblum
to execute the virus.  Alien vessels attack the base and the
jets, destroying all but the supporting cast.  Drunken oaf
Quaid volunteers for a strike force and blows up the mothership.
Pullman also flies a jet to fight the aliens.  Even more
amazing, Smith and Goldblum escape the aliens alive.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Steve Kong
Well, what can you say about a film brought to you by Roland Emmerich and
Dean Devlin, the "creative" team behind Stargate? Not much.  They bring
more uninspired sci-fi that is not more than a derivative of many original
films before it. To say the least, Independence Day is an overly long
special effects driven summer movie. Is that bad? In some cases no, and for
a while, it looked as if Independence Day was going to be good.
Independence Day is the textbook example of a special effects and media
hype driven movie. The story is almost quick and easy, aliens come to
Earth, they don't want to make friends and share in knowledge, they want to
destroy us and mine our planet for all its got. If Emmerich and Devlin
could have make the movie with such a short sweet premise and then driven
that with special effects, Independence Day would have turned out OK. But,
Emmerich and Devlin chose to add to the story. Adding to the story a large
set of two-dimensional characters and their stock cliched lives. And then
on top of that, to make Americans happy, they sprinkle on some hurrah for
the audiences in the US. This puts a tremendous weight on the film, and
halfway through the film, the weight starts to crush the film.
Independence Day starts off well with the song "It's the End of the World."
 And then gets even better with the alien attack.  But, after the attack,
the film starts to strain. And for the next forty some odd minutes, it
almost seems as if the film has come to a complete halt.  The ending is
exciting enough, but it is not a good enough pay off for the slow
midsection of the film.
I admit, I had a bit of silly fun when I saw the film, and I even own the
film on laserdisc. But, it is that center of mass in this film that crushes
the film. Independence Day runs two hours and twenty-five minutes, the film
could have easily been edited down to two hours or even an hour and a half,
but Emmerich and Devlin push on and try to tell a few love stories in
between. The special effects are there, and they are satisfying to a point,
but some of the effects look very retro in comparison to some of the
current crop of special effects.  The aliens look different enough from any
other movie alien, but the question is, how do those guys stand on those
small feet?  The aliens in here are scary, but they are not as scary as
Giger's Alien from the Alien Trilogy.  The spacecraft?  Cute, but mostly
uninspired, the mother ship is a blob, and the small fighter ships are
smaller blobs.
The biggest joy of the movie is Will Smith, who currently is still
protecting Earth from aliens in the more enjoyable Men In Black. Smith
gives as good as a performance he can with the limited role he is given.
Judd Hirsch gives a wonderfully funny performance as Goldblum's father.
And the last, though strangely morbid, joy of the film is the destruction
sequence that was shown oh-so-much during the trailers.
Pullman also does a decent job as the President of the United States, but
he looks a bit young for that position. As for the other supporting roles
they include the following. Vivica Fox as a stripper that Smith's character
is going to marry. Randy Quaid as a, get this, drunken pilot, and Quaid
highly overplays his part. Robert Loggia plays a stiff General. Mary
McDonnell gets to play First Lady.  Brent Spiner (Data from Star Trek The
Next Generation) makes a guest appearance as a scientist working at Area
51.  There are about another half a dozen other speaking roles in
Independence Day.  With this many speaking roles, you can see how
characters can easily be turned into two-dimensional characters.  Had a few
of these characters been consolidated into a more three-dimensional and
interesting character, it would have made the movie better.
I can make a long list of gripes I have with the movie, but I won't (though
if you really want, email me).  See the movie and you can see why I have a
long list of gripes.  Sure, this is supposed to be a loud, dumb, explosive
summer film, but Emmerich and Devlin have taken the dumb part to an
extreme.  I think that in some cases they have taken it to an extreme to
inject some humor, but in other cases, as with the ending, they have just
taken it to the extreme.  This leaves the audience asking themselves, "How
dumb do you think we are?"
Is Independence Day fun?  Yes, to an extent.  The first third is fun.  The
last third is fun.  The midsection is atrocious.  Now that Independence Day
is out on video, rent it and try it out.  And be glad that your VCR can
fast-forward, because skipping the midsection is almost necessary to enjoy
the film.  Emmerich and Devlin's next "creative" outing will be next
summers' Godzilla, let's hope that somewhere between the release of
Independence Day and the editing of Godzilla that they have learned to cut
a faster moving, tighter, and a little bit smarter movie.  But, I doubt
this, for Independence Day had made a boatload of money because of early
media hype, which afterwards the film did not live up to.  Godzilla
previews have now started, and the media machine is turning, lets see if
Emmerich and Devlin can churn out something worthy of the massive media
hype this time.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Talk about fireworks!  Director Roland Emmerich (STARGATE) and his
co-writing and producing partner Dean Devlin (also from STARGATE) have
cannily combined three decades worth of popcorn pictures-- chiefly by
drawing upon the colliding worlds of George Pal, George Lucas, and Irwin
Allen-- to create this spectacular, super-cheesy, and surprisingly
good-natured depiction of the end of the world as we know it.  The
formula should be familiar to anyone under the age of seventy:  ominous
music precedes a coming threat which is followed by mass destruction
which is survived by an ensemble of stock characters who are played by
B-list actors who must react to special effects that we know they can't
see all while looking very serious as their characters work together to
save the rest of the human race.  Did I miss anything?  Oh yeah, and
they make a *lot* of jokes along the way.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY is conveniently divided into three acts.  On day
one, titled "July 2," an armada of 15-mile wide spaceships position
themselves over the world's major cities.  In the United States-- the
movie focuses almost entirely on what happens in America.  Touche
international interests-- panic ensues, people head for the hills, and
the President (Bill Pullman, probably miscast but who cares?) wonders if
we can't all just get along.  In Los Angeles, a rooftop group of "New
Agers" are the first to be vaporized-- an amusing touch-- in the most
frightening firestorm seen on-screen since TERMINATOR 2: JUDGEMENT DAY.
New York and D.C. are also leveled, but not before Air Force One
escapes.  Billions die and hundreds of theater seats are mangled as
audience members hold on for dear life.
     On day two, titled "July 3" and do you see a pattern here?, the
survivors begin formulating their strategies for fighting back.  The
brain trust, congregated at a secret military installation in the
Southwest, includes a brilliant broadcast engineer (Jeff Goldblum), a
wise-cracking fighter pilot (Will Smith, a scene- stealer), a suspicious
Secretary of Defense (James Rebhorn), and a geeky government scientist
played by none other than Brent Spiner, better known as Data from the
television series "Star Trek: the Next Generation." (Needless to say,
his appearance causes certain audience members to begin foaming at the
mouth.  Don't forget your Ritalin, boys.) There's even a kooky crop
duster on hand, played by Randy Quaid, who swears that he was once
abducted by aliens.  Thank goodness we're watching a movie that doesn't
take itself too seriously!
     Day three is the big finale, when the President makes a cornball
speech and everyone charges off to "kick E.T.'s ass." This last hour is
also the weakest section in the film.  In particular, the editing could
use a few nips and tucks toward the end.  (Here, a scene runs long;
there, a sequence seems slightly truncated.) Another suggestion for the
inevitable director's cut:  add more scientific mumbo jumbo.  Though
INDEPENDENCE DAY consistently adheres to its own scientific principals--
such as joysticks being the intergalactic standard for fighter craft
controls-- even a *little* more explanation would go a long way to
satisfying the nit-pickers who are currently clogging the Internet with
their discussions of same.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY is probably the most honest of the summer movies.
Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin are, indeed, the Real Thing-- that
increasingly rare breed of genuine showmen, whose dedication to their
craft can seemingly survive any attempt at prepackaging by their
marketing department.  These guys want nothing more than to put on a
good show and, thus, their movie lacks even a whiff of pretension.
(Which, undoubtedly, is a source of frustration for many critics.) All
that is good, bad, and ugly about sci-fi and disaster films is
represented here.  Given the range of intentional references-- from the
likes of THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE to THE WAR OF THE WORLDS-- I suspect
that both Roland and Dean would even be proud to see their movie shown
on MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000.  It's *that* cool.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Author
Kevin Maguire
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producer: Dean Devlin
Stars: Will Smith, Jeff Goldblum, Bill Pullman, Harvey Feirstein, Randy 
Quaid, Mary McDonnell, James Rebhorn, Judd Hirsch, Harry Connick Jr., 
Robert Loggia.
        Moviegoers like two things about summer movies. For June and 
July, we ask for big, slick, hard-nosed thrillers. In August, we check 
our watches, and go down to the playhouse to watch films that prospered 
at Cannes and Sundance. 
        You would expect that INDEPENDENCE DAY(Twentieth Century Fox, 
PG-13) would be exactly number one. But really, ID4 is engineered so that 
ALL can see the forthright special effects. But really, the filmakers 
are eliminating where they can get the meat, the action. But no, not one 
star says a swear. I would expect if a 15 mile long object was hovering 
into your atmosphere, SOMEONE would say an expletive. 
        Let's steer clear of the complaints for a second, of which I 
could go on and on about. ID4 sets out to do something that it virtually 
can't lose at. It's a 75 million dollar picture, with the Empire State 
Building, the White House and other objects crashing to the ground. I 
mean, how could the audience be disapointed? The comedy is an engaging 
part, because it puts more into the characters that a regular action film 
would. Will Smith plays a fighter pilot, and his lines are well written. 
he's given one funny line after the other in a desert.
        But the thing is, when is the comedy appropriate? When Will Smith 
was in the desert, it was only several minutes after his buddy, played by 
Harry Connick Jr., was shot down and killed. Smith even laughs when he 
finds the body, and the alien that gobbled it up. Also, it a scene before 
that, the pilots are preparing a full-frontal attack on the ship, when we 
find Will Smith delivering lines again. ID4 seems to have fallen victim 
to the TWISTER syndrom. The filmmakers, too busy with high level effects, 
don't bother to give the film any emotional base. It's all action, so 
essentially, we can't follow the actors, and we can't understand what 
they do and why they do it.
        Of course, ID4 will keep you, at least for a good half of it, out 
of your seat. The advertising campaign, however, has put too many of the 
films shots in the previews, so I had seen half of them already. 
        ID4, althought not realizing it's trying, is striving to make 
STAR WARS 4. They're trying to reincarnate the Han Solo character as Will 
Smith. Of course, Will Smith is not as good an actor as Harrison Ford, 
and never will be. They try to put Luke Skywalker as the President, 
played by Bill Pullman, whose wife is in a plane crash, then is 
discovered by Will Smith's wife. After all this, the movie kills her.
        My final complaint, however, goes to the writers lack of 
ingenuity in creating new characters. Jeff Goldblum not only is a 
blueprint on Ian, the mathematician from JURASSIC PARK, but he has the 
same lines as him in the end of the movie, saying "Go faster. Must go 
faster." And Randy Quaid, from the upcoming KINGPIN, is redoing his part 
from the NATIONAL LAMPOON movies. Ditto for Harvey Feirstein, who plays 
the gay guy over and over again, so that it gets repetitive. 
        The summer is moving pretty fast, but so far, I'm still waiting 
for the emotional part of it. Which brings up a pretty interesting point, 
did ID4 show at Sundance...???

Author
Scott Renshaw
Starring:  Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd
Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid, Robert Loggia, Vivica A. Fox.
Screenplay:  Roland Emmerich, Dean Devlin.
Director:  Roland Emmerich.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In case you are just emerging from Biosphere 2, or have been
otherwise hermetically sealed away from all media for the last twelve
months, INDEPENDENCE DAY is about an alien invasion of the earth.  20th
Century Fox began running teasers for its major summer entry sometime
around the mid-1980s; they flew planes over the cities targeted in the
film, warning of impending doom; they sent out massive theater lobby cards
which required a light rail system to get from one end to the other.
Whatever the production budget was for INDEPENDENCE DAY, the marketing
budget probably came close to matching it, and it appears to have worked.
People are a-buzz over INDEPENDENCE DAY, and theater owners successfully
lobbied to have the opening moved up to July 2nd.  All that money
spent...and by all evidence, not a dime of it went to a good script
doctor.
     By now, I am fully aware that the call for better scripts in summer
blockbusters is a cry in the wilderness; the success of TWISTER has proved
beyond a shadow of a doubt that little else matters if impressive visual
effects are on the bill of fare.  What makes INDEPENDENCE DAY so
frustrating is that its complete failure as a story does not appear to be
the result of laziness.  Director Roland Emmerich and producer Dean
Devlin, who co-wrote the screenplay, were trying to create an epic
tale-of-three-cities, beginning with the appearance over Los Angeles, New
York and Washington D.C. of giant spacecraft on July 2nd, their subsequent
attack and humanity's attempt to resist on July 4th, and several
characters are followed through those three days.  There is David Levinson
(Jeff Goldblum), a satellite engineer whose ex-wife Connie (Margaret
Colin) is the Chief-of-Staff for President Thomas Whitmore (Bill Pullman),
and Capt. Steven Hiller (Will Smith), a Marines pilot separated from his
girlfriend Jasmine (Vivica A. Fox), a single mother who is one of the few
survivors in Los Angeles, along with the First Lady (Mary McDonnell).
     The half-dozen or so sub-plots which wind through INDEPENDENCE DAY
suggest that Emmerich and Devlin really wanted to make human drama matter.
Instead, they created a story full of one-dimensional characters, absurd
coincidences and laughably uninteresting interpersonal conflicts.  A
couple of performances manage to rise above the nonsense -- Will Smith,
who has far more charisma than this film deserves and is almost always
entertaining when he is on-screen, which is not nearly often enough; and
Brent Spiner, who has fun as the eccentric scientist in charge of
examining the remains of the infamous Roswell, New Mexico spacecraft from
the 1950s -- but mostly there are forced emotions and nascent cliches like
the bickering-estranged-spouses-who-still-love-each-other.
     But let's get down to the real business:  at times, INDEPENDENCE DAY
looks great, a real apocalypse wow.  The dog-fight sequences are complex
and exciting, particularly a one-on-one battle between Smith's Capt.
Hiller and an alien fighter which whizzes through canyons at break-neck
speed.  At other times, believe it or not, it looks cheap.  Some of the
digital effects are too soft around the edges, and INDEPENDENCE DAY skimps
on a face-to-face showdown with the aliens.  That is a big mistake,
because the only time in INDEPENDENCE DAY when there is any genuine
tension is when scientists get hold of -- and have to deal with -- an
alien survivor.  There is something cold about an Ultimate Battle which
comes down to a showdown between ships.
     Then again, a swarming alien ground invasion might have given
Emmerich and Devlin just one more better film to crib from.  INDEPENDENCE
DAY feels like a hodge-podge of quotes from science fiction classics like
STAR WARS (the "mother ship cruising overhead" opening shot, as well as
the trench run finale), RETURN OF THE JEDI (the multi-craft dog-fight) and
ALIEN (the design of the aliens).  Even the film's self-promoted nickname,
"ID4," evokes TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY's "T2" campaign from a few years
ago.  To top things off, the president gives what is intended to be a
rousing address to his hopelessly outnumbered troops; it was supposed to
be his "St. Crispin's Day" speech, but it's so lame it makes you wondered
how this guy was ever elected _class_ president.  INDEPENDENCE DAY appears
to be the meticulously constructed result of one of those screenwriting
programs which are supposed to give you all the elements for a complete
story...and of course, all those elements come from other films.  You
can't buy inspiration, and INDEPENDENCE DAY is woefully short on anything
that rouses the imagination.  It's a kick-ass trailer that's wagging a
dog.
